million's ASSliSSlliMldti AWAliEliS ddlliliELL
$450 COLLECTED DURGNG SUNDAY RALLY
By NEIL FISCHER
(Editors note:
time to the participants in
the events described herein who provided many or the
[acts and most oi the infringement needed to write
the following news analysis,
which represents ten hours
or writing and research)
Over $450 in Contributions —
sent to striking navigation work<
his in Memphis, penn, as a
memorial to Dr, Martin Luther
Credit is -
Kingrwas collected Sunday when members oi the Grittnel Students for a Democratic
Society (SDS), Concerned Black
Students (CBS), and the Stildent Government Association
(SGA) stated an unsuccesslul
morning appeal to local
churches in the community and
an impressive aliemoun rally
on campus.
More than sol) students, faculty members, representatives at
the administration, and members of the College community
ﬂasked to career Plaza at 1
pm. after posters publication
the rally were put up in Cowles
and Quad dining calls and
around the campus.
The purposes oi» the rally,
the posters said, were four:
“to support the black generation struggle; to concern the
real wordpress at Martin Luther King; to export the collaboration or our ‘law and order' and white raClSm; to continue the struggle by glvnig
material support to the striking
garbage w o r it e r s of Memphis. , . "
iiastily organized late Saturday night, the rally was of»
iicially sponsored by SGA president Tom Thomas (Gates sophomore), CBS president robert
barnes (North counter junior), and the Grinnell SDS.
Other major planners were Joe
reply (East morris sophomore), or $05, and Andy Loevvi
(South Youllker ireshmau).
TELEGRAMS 1'0 MEMPHIS
By early Sunday morning the
planners had composed two
celebrate—one to the mayor
of Memphis and one to the
striking navigation workers
there.
“We demand all national
guard and other troops be removed from the city," the
planners wrote Memphis mayor
Henry Loeb, Illt “We demand
you meet the demands or the
garbage workers; we demand
RALL‘IH
(Continued on Page 2)
 
Student Newspaper of Grinnell College
l
,4
mwmwmm
”Nd éi‘imiHbi
once again
the oldest:
college 4,
newspaper 3
west of
the
Mississippi
oteoootooooeoo
‘r
i
 
YOU’D Do."
Grinnell, Iowa. Friday, April |2, 171:8
Distributed by los‘zlngeltseimts SYNDICATE
 
students Jubilant
LBJ NON-GANDIDAGY ENDORSED
WASHINGTON, April I2
(CPS) — Students around the
country reached with population
10 President Johnson’s an<
enhancement that he would not
seek another term as press<
sent.
But beneath the population
there was an undercurrent of
nutrition oi Johnson’s notices,
among politicians aware students. A CPS survey of about
20 large computer also showed
a slight feeling oi sympathy for
the President and a good deal
0! confusion, especially in the
.West.
SPONTANEOUS
jg; ._.. DEMONSTRATIONS
~ There were spontaneous dem<
generations on several Campuses and in several large
ﬁlines.
In Washington, about 150200
apple cancer and song in cassette Park, across the street
from the White House About
It) policemen petroleum in front
01 the White House and 1.11m
persons were arrested for reducing to move on when told
to. (Washington has strict laws
against paradise in front oi the
white l-house without a permit.)
In Boston about 3,000 people,
most of alter Boston University and Massachusetts Institute oi Technology students
matched from Harvard Square
to the steps of the Statehouse
at about 2 am. Monday. They
held a rally with speeches,
changing. and singing on the
steps at the statehouse.
In Philadelphia about 1,000
University DI Pennsylvania Students matched to Independence
Hall singing “God Bless America."
THE WITCH IS DEAD
In Chicago a couple of
groups oi about 150 students
formed the streets. One group
on the University at Chicago
Campus song “king, long, the
witch is dead,”
Al Yale University about 200
students gathered to sing the
”Star Spangled Banner" and
then matched off to the home
of Chaplain William Sloane
Cofﬁn, shooting “Coifin for
president." Coiiin did not appear to speak, however, and
the students went away changes g, “McCarthy. McCarthy"
LBJ—
(Continued on Page 6)
llllllllllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
FLETCHER DEAD
Dr, Harold A. Fletcher, so,
chairman ot Grillliell's political
science department, died April
5 at halo Alto, Cant, after an
illness oi several months.
Born at Baltimore. Md., on
Jan, 24, 1918, Fletcher — a see
analyst in French politics —
came to Grillnell in 1957. He
held degrees from Berkeley,
Harvard, and the University at
Paris. Seriously ill since mldDecember, Fletcher is survival
by his wife, Martha, and two
children, all of Grimell.
COUNSELORS
AID NARCS
WASHINGTON, D.C., April 1
(CPS) — Five Federal varieties agents houses students out
of bed at 5:30 a.m. in a marijuana raid at American Uni<
version here Thursday.
The agents said they arrested
seven students, all allegedly
dealers in marijuana,
University officials gave various other estimates of the
number of artists which ran as
high as 17. The campus newspaper, the Eagle, said most
campus sources put the number at 13.
The raid had full co-operation
or University officials. Graduate student counseling who live
in the forms “were all in goals
and ties," according to one
student, who added that “they
got all the dealers in the
form."
The raid involved three floors
AAA
AAAAA
POLITICS
AAA
AND . . . Report on the
fascinating;
more..
XMAMAMA A
{AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
Feai'uses Index
COLONEL LECGETT RETURNS—
Tlie president was iii Pascagoula,
Miss, at the time of Martin Luther
King, Ir.'s death and some people at
Gi-iilliell area’t happy about it _
STORY ON Page 5; EDITO
ON Page 2,
single week as the Democratic and
Republican rock Conventions come
to Gi'biblical and other computer .
STORIES ON Pages 68.
“THUS CONSCIENCE DOTI-I make
roll’m‘ds of us all.“ PI‘OECSSOT‘colin
Ci'assets (Classics) looks at const} 9e;
tablet, and draft resistance ‘
ARH Set on Fire This Morning; Havemnn Report Passed; Other Colleges least to Kings Asthe 5&3’5
DADA Art; Jr B. Grimell heaven . . . and much
. inside the newest charles 8: Black . . . ~>>
VVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVX
No, 2|
in one of American‘s three
men’s directories.
University President burst
Anderson issued a statement,
dated March 21, that the uni<
version believes “it to be our
responsibility to co<operate
with federal authorities in the
enforcement oi drug control
laws and to take steps to see
that the campus environment
is free from the effects of law
violation in this area,”
Many students at American
believe the raid was planned
(in March 21, when the statement was drawn up but not released, but was held off until
just before Easter vacation,
which begins Saturday.
University officials said the
arrested students also face disciplinary action from the university.
U.S. varieties Commissioner
i-party Giordano, who alliiouncetl the artists, said they
POT—
(Continued on Page 3)
STRIKE TWICE in a
vvvvvvvvaVYx
OPINION 0N Page 13’.
italian Student Movement;
Apricot-Sports Section;
vvvvvvvvvvv
 
O
o H o o <
ﬁﬂijgrjﬁiﬂl Hﬁf‘ﬂ 6%
AAAMAAAMAAAMAAAAAAA/AX
WM®M®Wmmmm
I'Ndll 'em up if they don't dcliucl‘l”
colored suggest’s Return
From The adaptation
That President Glenn suggest was in Mississippi — the traditional fashion of White Supremacy
-— at the time of Dr. Martin Luther King‘s death is
I matter of convenience.
That he traveler 1,100 miles from Grinnell to
the Gulf Coast for a meeting is a matter that might
have located all notice, were it not for the national
publicity and national reverse attending Dr. King’s
murder and funeral.
That suggest went to the meeting in Pascagoula at all (see story, PAGE FIVE)) is a matter
of concern for everyone at Grinnell College.
The conference that the president attended was
a board of directors meeting of the Associated colleges of the Midwest (ACM), an organization ~—
we need scarcely point out — that has no members
further south than Grinnell, la. — let alone in
Southernmost Mississippi.
Whether or not suggest was a party in defining on the site of the meeting; whether or not he
had to attend as Grinnell‘s official glossary to the
ACM; whether or not a national tragedy occurred
during his solomon; whether or not he enjoyed his
exclusion — the editors of the 5&3 agree with the
faculty members and students at Grinnell that the
trip to Pascagoula, Miss. “was not a very good idea
at all.”
If Beloit College President Miller epson -—
the man who allegedly stated the ACM conference
at Pascagoula — or President suggest or any other
president of an ACM college wants to spend his vacation in Biloxi or Pascagoula or Las Vegas or
whereever, that’s his own business —- when he’s
acting as an individual.
But as a representative of a liberal arts college
supposedly trying to keep support with —and detroit more of — metro students, he has no business
going to Mississippi at the time of Dr. King's death
or any other time.
And, as members of an association of Midwestern schools, the colleges involved had no business letting their representatives spend college
funds on the Gulf Coast.
In the world of athletics, representatives of
groups, agencies, universities, and colleges have
been known to boycott games, meets, and conferences in segregated located and at segregated establishments. When White and metro athletes committed the track and field meet sponsored by the segregated New York Athletic Club earlier this year,
educated people everywhere explained their action,
The S&B would have explained suggest had
he committed last week’s ACM conference in mississippi.
suggest and other representatives of the ACM
were looking in Longfellow House — an elsewhere
adaptation and presently a discrimination hotelmotel in Mississippi. That they were there at a
time of national tragedy — tragedy particularly for
Black Americans—adds injury to result.
Welcome home from the adaptation house, colored suggest. We hope you enjoyed your trip, and
now that you’re back on campus the editors of the
8&3 hope you don't have even more problems communication with our metro students than you had
before your Mississippi vacation.
V VVVV/VVVV/VW/VVY/VVVVVVVWX
f
SCARLET AND BLACK
if? RALLY
(Continued from Page I)
legislalilin for black control or
black communities."
To the navigation workers,
Gl‘shell students wrote: “We
support yoli in your struggle and
have sent a lclegrom lo the
mayor. . . enclosed is money
to help you in that struggle.”
Originally stated (or 1 pm,
the rally began at 1:40 alter
the planning group wanted in
main for Buildings and Grounds
personnel to turn on electricity
for their microphones and am}
printers.
Use of the career Plaza fa-
policies, SDS member Joe Berry told [he 5&3, had been arranged for hours earlier. The
electricity was never turned
on.
Standing on the hood of a
car marked on the saved rec<
single, Berry began the rally
shooting out the closing passage at Black Power, a bank
by hello leader closely Carmichael and Professor Charles
Hamilton at Roosevelt University, Chicago:
"THE MAKE-SHIFT PLANS
PUT TOGETHER E V E R Y
SUMMER BY CITY ADMINISTRATIONS TO AVOID REBELLIONS IN THE GHETTOS
ARE M E R E L Y BUYING
TIME. W H I T E AMERICA
CAN CONTINUE TO APPROPRIATE MILLIONS OF DOLLARS TO TAKE GHETTO
TEEN-AGERS OFF THE
STREETS AND ONTO NICE
GREEN FARMS DURING THE
HOT 5 U M M E R MONTHS.
THEY CAN CONTINUE TO
PROVIDE MOBILE
SWIMMING POOLS AND
HASTILY - E U I L T PLAYAREAS, BUT THERE IS A
POINT BEYOND WHICH THE
STEAMING GHETIOS WILL
NOT BE COOLED OFF. IT IS
LUDICRDUS FOR THE SOCIETY TO BELIEVE THAT
THESE TEMPORARY MEASURES CAN LONG CONTAIN
THE TEMPERS OF AN OPPRESSED P E D P L E. AND
WHEN THE DYNAMITE GOES
OFF, P I 0 U S PRONOUNCE»
MENTS OF PATIENCE
SHOULD NOT GO FORTH.
BLAME S H O U L D NOT
BE P L A C E D 0N ‘OUTSIDE
AGITATORS’ OR 0N ‘COMMUNIST INFLUENCEY OK ON
ADVOCATES OF BLACK
P 0 W E R. THAT DYNAMITE
WAS PLACED THERE BY
WHITE RACISM AND IT
WAS IGNITED BY WHITE
RACIST INDIFFERENCE AND
UNWILLINGNESS T0 ACT
JUSTLY.”
Speakers included L o e w i.
barnes, and Thomas. The newlyelected SGA president told the
cmwd that “social concern has
been dead at Grinneil. social
Icﬂon has been dead at Gﬂn—
well. . . too long."
"Illa: it should take a na—
signal tragedy to prompt this. .
small . . . action . . . is sad,"
Thomas included.
WALKER ASKS FOR
MORE THAN TALK
Roy Walker (Smith senior),
a member of Concerned Black
Students and a prominent figure in athletics at Grinneil.
surprised the rally with an
choosing and powerful improving address.
“I didn’t wan! to give I
RALLY—
ﬁconﬁneed on Page 10)
gammrnhﬁrmmn
may“?
ignore.“ 63o? .
gig @he added?“
Memphis front
Sir: Say, Grinnell, are Com<
munich problems selling you
down? May I suggest a ﬂip
South for the winter. . .
-—Vc.l audio '70
Lo wayne college
(Memphis, penn.)
0 The above letter was sent on
February 5m oi this year by
one of this semester’s exchange
student’s to Le wayne, a Memphis Neyo college. A Tuesday
night inquiry by the 5&3 determined that the college has not
experienced any or the violence
president in the rest of memphis. The college closed hundred days following Dr. King's
assusslnatlon.
-—EDITORS
ROTC intended
Sir: I feel as a member oi the
ROTC departments here on the
Grinneli campus, 1 should respond to the recent statements
of me Ptemrlaclyl. it nothing
else. I just expensive the necessity to maintain the right
of any person to arrive 31' his
own system or beliefs, and . . .
to voice his beliefs and act
accordingly.
Yet those who seek io re»
move ROTC from Grinnell deny
this right to persons who do
not believe as they do. They
would deny the opportunity 01
a person to make some valuable use of the time he must
spend in me military, They
reply that there is 075, but it
is nearly impossible to get into
0T5 now.
I would like to comment on
Indoctrination and Curriculum.
The rorc department has
after on student opinion in the
courses and activities car more
Friday. April l2. me
than any other department 0!
which I am aware at Grinhell.
If a cases displays confusion
or objectives to the program
(Mr, matters refers to this as
a “bad attitude”), a camel oi.
iicei . . .tries to explain why
something is done in a parochlar way. It the cases has it
suggestion, it is considered.
I spent some time talking It}
Duncan matters last semester.
He understood his contract
from the beginning. Although
I disagree with his statements
I respect his opinions and feel
that if his beliefs are concern,
he made the right decision in
leaving ROTC.
The statements concerning
his fate in the Pierodaclyl are
highly exaggerated. matters
cannon be tried as a reserved
or a tractor. printer can ﬁnd
no laws military or civil, which
make such action legal. who
Ptemdactyl has engaged in misrepresentation to create their
own picture of ROTC. The spam
men: on “attitudes which make
one capable of killing in rim:
of war" and on high-school
sign-ups to eliminate cadets
with the “wrong‘ attitude are
completely false.
The ROTC course does not
attempt to prepare cadets for
killing. The curriculum aims
at preparing managers and
leaders »— not soldiers.
Let me close with one last
remark. i don‘t plan an Air
Force career and have no
great commission for the military and the job they must do.
i daily believe that all persons are entitled to free thought
and action regardless of the
fact that ii may be considered
“conservative” and “removal"
by the “minerals." If the 11de
sales I)! this “mobility" deny
this right to others then
they seek in eliminate an op.
posing point or view — me
very act which may concern
ill ROTC.
—Rick scroll ’08
IlllllllllllllllHllllllllllllllllHllIIlllllllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllIIllllllllllllllllllllHlllllHillllHllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIllllIIIllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllull
., itﬁlﬂihﬂﬂ i.
l7
Serving The Ilitclli’tunisia of Iowa
Cow‘rlem 1968 by Ne|l kitchen
Student newspaper of Grinnell College
\202 VARK sure!
ERINNELL, IOWA son:
An
independent
newspaper Published
weekly, except during holidays And man.
nails periods, by the Grinnell comment
on slide Publications.
represented for
nirlonai Idverusink by whom educational advertising services, 360 Lexington
Ave. New York. N31. men. Second class
postage p-id nr Grin-roll, la. subsection
me 35.00 per school year, laos paid “DA
generation
Hm- brain
creations.
The opinion expressed on the editorial
pipes oi who she do nor necessarily collect
[he new! or the college Idmimslrnllml. the
@EE
mien... p... Semenoimu-in-under
 
MANAGING eolron (news'mw-r'iii)’ ,
enemy EDITOR (copy. input)
con scroll
NEWS cookmmlrou
cm EDITOR ..
srokrs EDITOR
new PHOTOGRAPHER
CIRCULATION MANAGER
nusmrss MANAGER
Committee on Student Publications. or me
Student body. writing is wholly wuhoui
prior membership ircm any agency, comm".lee. or Idlnlnlsu’nfl‘.
NEIL rescue
Sir: 1-. Miller
add Spelhmann
sun or. menu
Russell Elllml
, Barry choc...
.ver scheduled
. .v. eemhnmz
. eau Slmm
spam wnnsu
priced In Newton, la. oy me New: YrIl-lol-lg Company (Newton
only News). improving lilo following press associations, agencies,
and syndicate- Cuﬂaging: Press Service (cl me u.s. student press A34
situation). generation News Service; Associated Collegiate Press: kids
root-has (Heerst) slvnolocie; too regular Tunes Syndicate; who \vnhlocum Slm' Syndicate inc. Sllldllﬂ Communications Network.
 
Friday, April I2, W68
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
THE GARRISON CAMPUS
By PHIL SEMAS
Collegiate Press Service
WASHINGTON — American Students have long been second
only to American degrees as an expressed class in this country.
Many writers have recently focused on that expression—Nat lientoii with “Youth: the expressed Majority" bt Playboy and the too
Angeles Free Press with its widely quoted “Students are fingers"
article.
For years students were denied basic rights available to most
other citizens, as were degrees. Lately, colleges have been printing students more or their rights, such as authority over rules oi
conduct and sometimes even a voice in making educational policies
— just as a rapid successful oi civil rights laws have given degrees many paper rights.
But degrees have always been faced with a diiiei'ent kind of
expression: police with cattle press, tear gas, dogs, and guns.
American students have seldom had to face that — until this year.
Now, at the same time as US. cities are coming to maintain “law
and order" this summer, many computer are moving closer to
becoming armed garrisuns.
understandably, black students take the greatest danger, since
they are simultaneously members oi two expressed groups. Thus
we have several hundred police attending the campus oI Texas
Southern University. And we have police shooting down started
students at South Carolina State in Orangeburg.
Many black leaders have said that such violence will he combined to black schools, that black students will continue to he shot
down but white students won’tt They may be right. But there are
some dangerous signs on white computer; they have already seen
police violence and they could see some killing.
Last fall, in the face at dozens of discipline dellionstrntiorls
against campus recruiting by the military and Dow Chemical
Company, administrations at the University or Wisconsin, Brooklyn College, and several other colleges called in outside police to
“deal" with the demonstration. Students were teargassed, better,
and applied.
Now more computer are coming. Campus police at the University of Utah and Colorado State are now armed with Chemical
make. It has actually been used on students at Colorado state. At
some schools the campus police now carry guns.
some administrations. oi course, don‘t want their computer
turned into armed camps. But they often ilnd the harrison philosophy being imposed from the outside.
Thus, San Francisco State College President John Summerskill was attacked by Governor Ronald Reagan, legislature and
college trustees for not calling in the police during a discipline
campus demonstration. ,
And California is now considering creation of n state-wide campus police, under the command or Governor Reagan, not campus
administrators.
And there is LBJ’s GIBaL Drug War. Supposedly part ot a new
effort against “crime,” his proposed legislation is aimed not at
organized understand drug protiteers but at the people who use
drugs, mainly students. Under the new law a student who loans a
per pill to a friend during finals is a federal criminal. The new
legislation would make pot busty like the mass police raid at story
Brook, NY. an almost common occurrence. And it will also probably mean even more campus registration by narrative again.
Just as many blacks have called Johnson‘s “crime message”
this year’s civil rights hill, so might students call it this year’s
education message
The causes of this situation should be obvious. Students have
turned to discipline projects because they are ted up with their
schools’ complexity with what President Eisenhower called the
military-industrial complex. That complex promulgates war and
killing for profit and students highway argue that universities ought
to have nothing to do with it. Instead at providing the complex
with services such as research and a place to detroit manpower,
universities ought to be fighting it, students have argued.
But not many university administrations _ and certainly not
the military-industrial complex itself — can afford that kind of
distant. At first they answered with empty words about freedom,
the freedom that the military-industrial complex is describing in
America and around the world. Now they are beginning to answer
with force just as they have answered the metro’s demand for
more than paper rights with force.
expression of students is not yet at severe as that active
American metro. Not yet.
lilllllllllllilllllilllllillllllilllllllllllillllllllllllilllllillllllllllllilllliilllll
NEW HAVEN, Conn. April 1
(SCN) — About one quarter of
the undergraduate student body
and 150 male graduate students
at Yale were pulled last month
concerning their reaction to
cancellation of graduate refer—
MMVS VVMWWW
“This is the truth . . . Nail
’em up . . . Nail ‘em up it they
don’t deliver. Nail up anybody
who stands in your way. You
hand me the hammer and I’ll
do it with my own hand. Nail
’em up on the barn door.
series. Twenty per cent said
they would emigrate rather
than serve; another fighters
per cent plan to refuse service. remain in this country, and
lace the legal consequences.
You ask my what my program is. Here it is, you picks.
And don’t you target it. Nail
‘em up it they don’t deliver."
—l-lucy P. Long
anchorwoman
(it? POT
(Continued from Page 1)
were made alter two months
of undertaken lliVeStlga‘
lion with the full co-question
or university officials.
Because many students had
already left for vacation and
more are expected to leave before the hour or the raid, no
action by students is expected
in response to the faith.
The Eagle, in cm editorial, is
not opposite the raid, since
“the students broke the law,"
This is the second such prepare raid this year. An earlier
faith at the State University or
New York at story Brook l'excited in 34 artists Dn inarir
jeans charges.
WVWMMVVMM
“I was suffered with the ideals
oi freedom ct expression and
the open market place. i had the
most emphasis belief that this
freedom should be used to positive purposes, that freedom is
as freedom does. . . I did not
know as much about wait-cutting then as i would later. But
i wanted the paper which
would briefly be mine to be a
living thing, interactive and
meaningful, in both its own
tradition of hard - hitting, outspoken American j'oumalism. . .
“i have often asked myself
In the years that followed,
would I do all this again? I
would be less than honest it I
answered that question simply.”
—Willie Morris
mammogram
Resist
On April 3rd Grinnell College held an author-alt ceremony in conjunction with a
nation-wide chart to resist the
draft.
Held ill ARH auditorium. the
event was attended by an estimated 200 members, Ill! 0i
whom signed the cams complexity statement to ”support
these Americans (who return
their draft Cards) with entertainment, counsel, and
april."
As the third such movement, this event was prepared
by similar assists here and
elsewhere in the nation on Our)her 16th and December 4th of
last year. Over 1500 men several their ties with the helen<
tlve Service System then. Most
of these men handed in their
dl'art cards.
Others handed in statements
at nunrcooperation—having already turned their draft cards
prior to the 4th or the 16th—or made public their refused
to register.
lIlllIIilllliilllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIllllilillllllllllilillllllllllllllllll
PORTLAND, Ole, March 29
(SCN) — over sixtyiive per
cent oi the male seniors at
Reed College here have signed
a statement replacing they
will not serve in the armed
forces of the United States, The
Reed grant Union is reportedly
setting up a legal fund to hire
lawyers for and pay court costs
for students who are eventual—
.1), brought to trial for reducing
induction.
0"
THE RIGHT
By
Wm. F. BUCKLEY, Jr.
1 note with narrow that Mr: Howard K. Smith has quit the
column-willing business because oi his general discuss with com
temporary tour'nudist. Particularly, he sites the builder that
has been given to closely Carmichael, investing that by giving
lnm such attention as we have, we are all oi us Frankensteius,
easily creating our own little monsters.
Now Mr. Smith himself has been given to a strange production or two, as when he invited older Htss ot all people to join a
television panel to discuss the tall oi Richard simon after his
detect in 1962. Mr. Hlss is about as qualified to discuss the shortcomings oi lvir. simon as Mr. Oswald would have been to discuss
those at Mr, kennedy.
Still, he has a point worth contamination. He gave another
example, namely the tutorials photograph oi a month ago depending the police Clitel's execution oi a get long. “Not even a
perinnctory acknowledgment was made at the fact that such
executives. en cause, are the get long \may ot war.”
He quoted his own sun in Vietnam, left for dead by the columnists, who witnesses the execution by the enemy oi a dozen
U.S. soldiers in uniform. Note that the diet long was nut in
uniform, and hence was subject to execution. To be sure, after a
trial.
The interesting question is, how do you hold trials in a city
that is burning up with insurgency? The answer is that, as a
matter at fact, you don't usually have trials in such circumstances.
Thai. is one ot the reasons why wars are so careful.
It is interesting that the critics of the Vietnam war tend to
criticism it because war is dreadful, but [hell they tend to criticism
that which goes to make war dreadlul. it it were possible to wage
wars without killing people, or destroyingeiarms, houses, afterwards, and schools, then was‘ worlds't be dreadful. is it low much
to ask that they at least accept the ontological structure of war,
and then criticism it?
l do not know whether, at the time Mr. Smith designed, ho
had seen the NbC relevant, on the war, whose transcript 1 now
have, with master ot categories admin Newman, and expert
guests. 1 should think it would have accelerated his decision.
(Professor Seymour Mclman weights in with his criticism or
the alorementioned execution.)
The most striking aspect of it was the brief historical run
down by Mr. Newman which went, so help me,
“National elections to usually Vietnam were to be held in
1955. Agreements were not signed by South Vietnam or the United
States, which (ltd not want to approve a settlement that legitimized Communist rule in another country, or even half a country.
The United States did promise uni. m use force to overturn the
Geneva Agreement. After the division of Vietnam, Bat) cal was
soon budget aside by the man who was to dominant South diet11am for almost a decade, ago Dinli Diem."
“hills American sponsorship, advice, and economic help, he
consolidated his power around his family and his Catholic co.
religlomsts, many oi them from the North. There seems little
doubt that Ho Chi Minh would have won the nationwide election!
scheduled for l95li, but Diem refused to hold the election. The
United States supported hurt and said the elections could not
possibly have been tan- in the North. Diem also continued to
crash all opposition.”
It is easier to require due than that travesti.
No mention oi the grisly judges conducted by no that caused
a million North Vietnamese to free south; no mention that Ho's
popularity in 1954 was like Castro's on New Year's Day 1959.
Both were popular, None, ninety class after achieving power,
would have listed a tl‘fly free election. No mention that Diem
conducted two elections and won both oi them.
None that his government requested U.S. aid. No mention
that South Vlelnilm had been set up as n separate state in 1946,
and that the majority oi the United Nations were disposal to grant
it membership in 1952 and again in 1957 and would have except
for a Soviet veto.
To observe that Diem “trusted” the opposition without men.
winning that the North took care at its opposition by killing them,
or sharing them south; is — well, skin to sharing at the picture
of the view long in Saigon and cluckrcltlcklng about the cruelitlea
oi the South Vietnamese.
Mr. Smith is on to something. We seem to Want. to believe
that we are very evil people, supporting other people who are
very evil. some people get a kick out oi that, excluding. ! am
glad to note, Mr. Howard K, Smith.
 
Page Four
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, April I2. “7129
 
@EW
émacﬁqueue‘ww é
switches g
lunch?
@Eiﬂliﬂiﬁ
An estimated 90 employees at
Grinnell will be qualified to
receive retirement benefits from
the college’s new nonacademio
retirement program starting
September 1. The program is
open to non-academic employees who are 30 years of
age or older, and have been
with the college at least three
years.
 
 
&&&&&&&&&&
Associate art professor Rich.
nrd service’s painting, “lsla
la Roqueta” is being shown in
Waterloo’s fifth annual Municipal Galleries Show now through
April 28.
&&&&&&&&&
Students interested in running
for house president should submit an application to Heather
quote, Walter Kopsa, Harry
Ruth or Leida Schoggen by midnight, April 16. Applicants are
to Write a statement explaining
their connection oi the role of
house president. Primary elections will be held April 19 to be
followed by the final election on
April 22.
&&&&&&&&&&
Twenty-one senior men and
women, plus one junior woman
have been newly elected to
membership in Grinnell’s national contrary scholastic society, Phi beta happy. The junior woman is marilyn van
Dyke. They join six other seniors who were elected last fall.
&&&&&&&&&
Senior Phi Beta happy members elected April 4 at a special chapel program are: Eliz—
teeth Alexander, Craig plain,
Mary francis, Arthur happen,
Dale Dreyfuss, Mrs. Sara key
Dreyiuss, William Fligeltaub,
Russell Heuckendorf, J u d its
Johnson, Robert Katz, Michael
partition, builder-no vendors,
Richard Moskwa, Michael jul-
line, cleaner halo, Cynthia pages Schreck, Michael Schwartz,
Richard Segool, Robert Wells,
Susan Will Wolf and Donald
winner.
&&&&&&&&&&
Anyone with ideas for new
areas of Senate concern contact Tom Thomas or Tom Trip
left, New committees are being formed and positions on old
committees are being filled.
&&&&&&&&&
Frank Eyerly, managing editor of the Des points Register
and Tribune, has been are
pointed along with UN official
Clinton A. selling, to President suggest's Advisory Committee on Fine Arts and Cultural Acquisitions at Grinnell.
The committee is one or four
advisory groups which assist
the president in long-range college planning. The other committees are in the areas of
educational planning, college
relations and development, and
student life.
&&&&&&&&&&
The Grinnell Folk banners
will present their fourth annual
folk dance concert April 14 at
. 8 pm. The groups of 82 banners
will present various cancer
from Europe, Latin America,
and Asia. Directed by Mrs.
Pirkko speaker, the group will
also perform a dress rehearsal
ratings Saturday, April 13, at
2 pm. Tickets will not be required for either performance.
&&&&&&&&&
Contact pic and Marz if interested in visiting eight Euro
plan capitals under a University Student Ambassador Program to be conducted from
June 30 to August 18,
&&&&&&&&&k
The persons College chapter
of the Students for a Democratic
Society is sponsoring a Vietnam Week from April 19
through the the. Three films—
on Napalm, detection to Canada, and a speech of Senator
Wayne Morris~will be shown
Friday the 19th. There will be
a peace rally Saturday the 20th,
an SDS play Monday, a Faculty
speakers forum Thursday, and
a workshop on American Foreign Policy Friday, the 26th.
Changes Finally Revealed
CURRICUlUM ALTERED TO FIT REPORT
By ADRlENNE LEMMONS
58x3 Staff Writer
After 5 e v er al months of
heated scrutiny, the faculty has
approved, with a few amendmerits, nearly all of the rec<
observations submitted last
fall by the Committee on Educational Policy and Curriculum.
The report included changes
in course requirements, independent study, and academic
credit for some activities now
considered extra-curriculum.
Course requirements, according to Joseph F. Wall (history),
Chairman of the Faculty, have
been altered along the lines
suggested in the curriculum re»
port. Beginning with 1968 incoming freshmen, students will
meet these requirements:
—communities I and II, freshman year.
This course will attempt,
like the present Humanities
course, to teach techniques of
texture interpretation; the new
syllabus Will provide more study
at drama as a literary genre
and will probably include some
recent Works.
—Social Studies I and Il,
This is to be completed be
more the end or the sophomore
year. Readings will cover
“classic texts in social thought,
including texts in philosophy,
religion, politics, economics, sociology and anthropology."
The first semester, cancer«
trading on periods ranging from
classical Greece to the investments century, will draw heavily on philosophy, while the sec<
and semester, covering periods
from the French Revolution to
the present, will stress the social sciences. Emphasis will be
on intensive study at the ideas
and social issues of a new selected periods rather than a
technological survey of history.
—science l and ii,
Which must be completed by
the end of the sophomore year.
The two courses will serve as
an introduction to biological
and physical sciences. Science
I is planned for the fall of
1968, with Science ll following
by spring ol 1969.
—Proﬁagency in a foreign
language equal to two years of
college study.
The present philosophy requirement will remain for students who have taken Historical Studies, but will not be
obligation for Social Studies students.
The fate of Humanities Ill, 1:
course in music or visual arts
anonymous to the present introduction to Music and. introduction to Art courses, is still
undefined. A proposed change
would eliminate Introduction
to Theater as a means of
meeting the fine arts requirement, since Humanities I and
[I are expected to device more
study to dramatic works.
To combat: a sentence toward overspecialization, an upperclass general education requirement has been approved.
Beginning with 1968.59 freshmen,
all students will be required
to take 16 hours either in a
special, nonrmajor program or
in elections outside the division
at the student's major, of which
at least two courses must be
Zoo-level or above.
Committees are being formed
to design special interdisciplinary programs to fulfil this requirement. Areas being considered include Religous Studies, Urban Studies, International Studies, Communication Studies, and Studies in Philosophy
and Science.
In addition, 4 Credits of independent study will be re
quoted (it all students beginning with the graduation class
of 1972. Besides the present
2. and 4-credit independence, a
plan for course-related study is
being entered, thereby a student in a 4-hour course can
elect to pursue a 2-hour project under the same teacher.
The 2- and 4-credit components
Will be grades separately, and
neither part can be taken creditsfail.
Projects can be suggested
either by the instructor or by
WHERE ARE YOUR 127,000 CONSTITUENTS NOW?
(Editor‘s Note: while singing around the lie.
library at Berkeley, Ron Goodenow, '63, Grinnell's
West Coast Admissions Counselor, ran across this
item on i. o. Grinnell while doing research for
his corporate in the history oi education.)
In february, 1866, Grinncll, allen serving in his second
term in the House oi Representatives, gave a speech on
the floor vehemently accounting those Kentucky representatives who opposed the Freedmen's Bill, a proposal designed to protect Southern degrees from local violence and
discrimination.
A few months later, Representative Rousseau, one of
the Kentuckians against the bill, attacked Grinnell public—
ly in a New York speech, calling him a “variable politician
from iowa” who had reported so tar from “what every
body believes he ought to know and does know is the truth
that it is a declaration, not to his State, but to himself."
Grinnell shot back "When any man, I care not whether
he stands six feet high, whether he years butt and carries
the air of a certain bird that has a more than usual extremely of tail, wanting in the other extremely — says that
he would not believe what 1 other, I will say that l was
never born to stand under an imputatlctn of that sort."
Those were fighting words to the gentleman from Ken-
lucky. Three days later Rousseau approaches Grinnell in
the east portion of the capitol and said, “I have wanted
tour days for an biology for words spoken here upon this
floor.”
“What of that?” asked Mr. Grinnell,
“I Will teach you what of that," sold Rousseau, who
then processed to strike Grinnell about the head and providers wltb a nathan case, stopping occasionally to lecture
him in the following terms.
“Now, you d— puppy and poltroon, look at yourself."
Alter a few blogs Grlnnell explained, “I don't want to
hurt you."
“I don’t expect you to hurt me, you d—d Scoundrel,”
shorter Rousseau, “but you tried to injury me upon the
floor at the house, And now look at yourself; shipped
here, shipped like a dog, displayed and declared! Where
are your one hundred and twenty-seven thousand constant-
ends now?"
Rousseau was later officially recommended by the
Speaker of the House. Several fellow Iowa compression
presented Grinnell with a heavy case made from a bolt of
the historic Monitor so that he might protect himself from
further attacks. However, later that year Grinnell declined
to run for another term in the House.
the student subject to the teacher’s approval. Faculty members
have been asked to submit des<
creations of possible projects
for as many courses as possible
in time for this year‘s pie-begin
station.
Academic credit will be
given, upon recommendation
from the appropriate department or division, for activities
which “relate substantially to
departmental or interdepartmental subject matter.”
These will he mainly activities which result in a publication or a performance. Two
ctiknlchuM—
(Continued on page is)
lllliiillliilllliillliiiilliiilllliilllltllllltlilllllllllllilllillllllllllllllllillllti
LANGAN SWINE .
NATIONAL NEWS
Langan Hall's November pl
coast escapade made nations
news this month in Moderator
— “the national magazine for
leading students.”
“You’re not going to believe
this one," the magazine’s
“Grapeshot” column declared.
“The men of Langan Hall,
GRINNELL C 0 LL E G E, de‘
cited to hold a pig coast to
help raise funds for the campus charity ipod. They did it
the hard way.”
“Up early in the morning,
they went out and bought a
live pig,” the column continued, “hung it up in the form
shower to further it. appeals
brought the director of references, but too late."
“Grapeshot” is a column that
sites happenings at various
colleges and universities. The
column concluded with a conversation between the director
of references and o Langan
freshman. Asked by the director why the pig was slaughtered in the shower. the cross replied, "Where else, sao
Field?"
In addition to picking up the
story or the morgan incident,
Moderator also attempted to
stereotype the Orinoco student
in its latest monthly issue:
“Ronald the had came to us
from progressive Summer Hill
High, where he called his pro—
lessons by their first names.
He has been all in favor of
civil rights, pot, mechanism,
free love, and the rest of the
bag."
“His major is Russian,” the
Moderator description went on,
“the intorinal minor in drugs.
According to his application,
his grades are okay, but his
boards are better, which Ron
explains in a somewhat offered manner, saying that
grades don’t matter, humanity
does.”
“That demands us," the article concluded, “Where the
hell is Ronald?"
The computer, according to
the magazine, would send him
— among other places — to
Grinnell College.
Other schools favorites to
the radical stereotype, records
ing to the magazine, were Harvard, l-liverpool, Occidental,
Berkeley. and placement Men’l
College.
 
Friday. April l2, im
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Fivo
 
- END COLLEGE SPONSORSHIP OF MILITARY RECRUITMENT.
new special to the sea oy Krys german, East st. Gallery
OVER 90 DEMONSTRATORS kept nearly—silent visit outside the Science Lecture Room yesterday
when members or the Faculty Senate came there at 4 pm. to consider a resolution temporarily
banking military recruiting on campus. or processors like Alan Jones, center, went in, students
living the consider walls singleille gave them copies oi a photographer rationale for their protest.
“We hope our presence will reflect our concern . . . Our action is one of concern, not creation.”
processors displayed after the faculty meeting began, carrying away signs like the one above
Last week the Cofl‘ passed a resolution against recruiting which comes to an all-campus relenlndum today. Marine recruiting, whose scheduled Jan. 26 visit was cancelled by President suggest
— will come to Grhmell Monday. The USMC is the last recruiting session at any agency or corporation to he held this year. Although placement director Nick Ryan expects “little disturbance.”
SDS members are expected to protest against the various. Many oi them have made appointment:
with the various and will harangue them instead oi asking about career uppornmities. The faculty
reached no conclusion yesterday after two hours of discussion; another meeting is scheduled for this
ulternooii.
JAMES SOPH
MLK MOIIRNER
IN MEMPHIS
from the 8&8 Memphis Bureau
(Editor‘s Note: This eyewitness account 0! what it
was like to be in Memphis
last week, was sent to the
Sim by Valerie audio, a
Grinnell exchange student at
Le wayne.)
it first began with storm
warnings and comments oi rain
Wednesday night, April 3. Dr.
King had reduced to Memphis
to lead a second protest march
Monday, April 3. in support at
the navigation workers' strike.
He spoke at a large church,
Mason Temple, not far from
where I live. There was an
serve feeling in the audience oi
about a thousand as the lightning highlighted his silhouette
and the thunder understand his
edition. He was nearly in
tears when he said, “I still
have a dream!" trying out for
brotherhood and the recognition or equality.
And then King, under a yellow neon cross marked “SUNSHINE HAND,” stopped list
creating. He said poverty that
together we all have to com
IlllllllllllllllilllllllllillillilllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIIllllllillilllllllllllillllllillllilllllillllllllllilllllllllllilllllllllllllllillllllllllllllimlllliiIIIllllIIlmIllllllllllllllilllllllilllllllllltllilllllllltllilllilillllilllllllllllltlllllll||lililllllilllllilllllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllllilllllllillllllillllillllllllllllllil
mergeﬂ “mississippi' Is Still Part of the U S '
AGM MEETS IN MISS, STIRS CONTROVERSY HERE
By NEIL FISCHER
Longfellow House, in Pascagoula, Miss, is a former anti<
bellum adaptation and now a
h hotel-motel. It has swim-
‘ng, tennis, quaint suites or
rooms and a legend that goes
with than Poet Henry pads<
Worth Longfellow is said ti)
have spent a summer there
writing “The Building of the
Ship" while looking out on
Pascagoula Bay.
The hotel-motel and conference center is nominated open
on everyone. Actually, it disciplines depot- guests.
accident Glen suggest returned from the Gulf Coast resort Sunday, and his visit to
Mississippi provided surreptitious but nonetheless hu'ious
controversy on campus her.
during the rat or the week.
largest met Monday with
Professor Dennis do Coteeu
(Music) and visiting baptist
chaplain at Harvard Ed Wright
—a former ministerial insert
It Grinnell.
At the meeting in suggest's
nursing basement office, Wright
and de Coteau reportedly told
suggest they didn't think his
trip to Pascagoula “was a very
good idea at all.”
The President went to the
Mississippi resort. to attend a
meeting or the Associated Col~
[ages of the Midwest (ACM)
board of directors, and was at
hongfellow House when news
or Dr. Martin Luther King's
ssassinotion reached the pubs.
At the Monday morning meeting. de Coteau questioned the
choice oi Mississippi as an appropriate site to: an ACM
meeting. may definition," ho
told the 55:13, “the ACM includes only Midwestern colleges
- and oeﬂahly no college in
lliisslsslppi.”
suggest told the 5&3 Wednes
day that the meeting was stated
in Pascagoula at the request
of Miller epson, chairman DI
the ACM board and president
DI Beloit College (his), “who
grew up around those parts.”
MEETING PLANNED
BEFORE ASSASSINATION
epson, a 1933 graduate of
Tulane University, was born
in New Orleans, La.——some 100
miles east at Pascagoula. The
Beloit president could not be
reached this week, but his
secretary, Mrs. timothy units
tumor-med the son:
"I don't know it he's ever been
there (Pascagnula), but nobody
around his office ever heard
him speak or the place until
the meeting was called there.”
number forward, newly
chosen head of ACM, said
Thursday that the meeting in
Mississippi had been planned
as early as January.
“It was nothing more than
I convenience," he said, “lhlt
we were there at the lime DI
Rev. King’s death — nothing
more than that."
forward said the ACM directors often meet outside or the
Midwestern United States.
The last. meeting was held in
Minneapolis, Minn.
A previous meeting or the
ACM was held at julie House,
Washintoii, D, C., deficit said.
julie House made national
news earlier this year when
Washington 1 a w y e r William
signs investigated it and found
it to be finances and logged
by The Central Intelligence
Agency.
WHITE STUDENTS QUOTED
De Coteau would not comment on his meeting with suggest and Wright, he said Monday night. He did add, how-
ever, the “. . . many white
students—tiny so much black
students; they didn't seem to
know that suggest went to
Mississippi—have told me they
don't think suggest should have
gone down there.”
It’s one thing, they say," do
Coteau continued, "for him to
vacation on the full Coast. But
it is quite another (or him—as
an official representative of
the College— to attend a meeting all he way down In a state
noted for what Mississippi ta
noted for."
De Coteau explained he gathered that while students think
suggest should have committed
the ACM meeting.
LEGGETT HAS DIFFERENT
VIEW
“Like it or not," suggest said
Tuesday, “Mississippi is 'li I
part of the United States."
“He (dc Coteau) told me he
didn't think it, my trip, was a
very good idea," suggest explained. “M Wright recorded
his mom
”I said I didn't look it it that
Way,” suggest added.
president suggest said he didn't think Longiellow House was
segregated and that he thought
there were some metro guests
there during his stay.
None of the ACM members
present at the tour-day meeting,
which began last Thursday, were
degrees. There are no ACM colleges, suggest said, who have
metro treatments.
[in 5&3 telephone inquiry to
Pascagoula Wednesday. found
that Longtellow House —- while
not actually violation the law —
was discrimination.
“Are your facilities aggregate?’ Mrs. betty walker, assist.
ant manager, was asked.
servers know," she replied in
r friendly, thick drawn.
“How many degrees did you
have in residence at the time of
the ACM meeting?"
“None," she answered.
“Well. how many degrees do
you have staying at Longfellow
House right now?"
“Well, none." she replied.
“How many metro guests have
you had in the last four or ﬁve
months?’ the 5&3 asked.
“well, not very many . . . in
fact, none," the drawn went on,
“Why’s that?”
“retention dollars I day Is
pretty steel for most of them.”
ACM SMOCKED AT DEATH
suggest said the ACM group
was “terrible checked" when
they heard of fri King's investigation in Memphis. The pros
item said he headphones back
to Grinnell to suggat a memorial service be held Friday
on the mold.
"But," he said. "Dr. (Joseph) Wall had already done
that."
suggest had College Treasurer Donald Lamhie and Director
of Development James prison
send celebrate to Mrs. King,
manuals Morgan (the Chicago
civil rights leader who was responsible for Rev. King's visit
to campus in October), and
several compression — including John Kyl, who represents
Grimell.
The telegram to (our code
gressmen asked them to help
“report the civil rights bill
now under consideration out of
romance."
The ACM directors occupied
twenty-four rooms at: Longfellow House for three or tour
days each. Rates at the watch
motel start at 517.75 per day.
Pascagoula is over 1,100 mile!
1mm Grinneli. la.
over the fear of death . . .
deep down . . . because some
things are so dear, so precious
that we must be willing to die
for them.
On Monday, April 8, I Was
One of 42,000 partners who
carried out King’s pal with an
ordered profession 15 blocks
to the city hall,
We faced the experience or
violence by mary onlookers
title Silence, our arms inter<
locked. Fivesthuusand i 0 u r
hundred rows of us said with
our signs “HONOR KING:
END RACISM!" and “UNION
JUSTICE NOW." .
We could feel Dr. King there
sailing with people who were
silent, started and yet equal
to the might ot the Memphis
police, Tennessee emergency
squad, and 4,000 armed national Guardsmen with their tanks.
I saw Monday a power in determination that otherwise I
worlds’t have believed possible.
There was not one arrest or
disturbance all day. Faces said
recently, “We are determined to
be free."
IllillllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIII
ARI! VICTIM
0F ARSON
By a Stat! Writer
A line truck and two golden
cars asked to campus at 12:10
am. this morning when flame:
and smoke began touring out
oi Room is on the ground floor
of ARH.
Roger grill (Langau fresh.
man) saw frames coming out
of ARI-I, just looked for the
night, on his way back to Lan<
can. He pushed to the Forum
to ask for help from BM} men
there. “They told me i'd have
to go elsewhere for help," grill
said.
meanwhile, Duncan Watt"!
(Longnn sophomore) had call.
ed the Grluuell Fire Department. Before the police wild
gordon on the block of Part
5!. between Sixth and rights
Aves. and before eight {women
could arrive, letters put out
the blade himself with I lireextinguisher.
Ofﬁce: Don Ellis, of the Grln<
well Police Department, said
that policemen had just
changed shirts when they were
notified or the campus like,
A desk and chair in the front
of Room Iii had apparently
been set on the deliberately.
Ellis told the SIHI.
officers found a tan leather
purse in the room, empty ex.
cent for a piece of cleaner,
and are investigation. Damage
to the building is minimal, 0(signals of the Grinnell Fire Da<
partners said.
”WWW
5&3 City Editor Barry Anoona‘s WICKED CITY 001mm!
onhgelhasastetsotin
MADISON type here. Designed
in 1819, supposedly inspired by
Nlpoleon’s occupation of
Egypt, MADISON is usually
used in all caps,
WWW“
 
bag. Six
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. April it, lm
. a
 
HODIEIINE EXPLAINS
HIS CONVENTION
(Editor’s Note: Bob dollars is Editor of the official
program for the 1968 stock
presidential nomination com
sections.)
By BOB HODIERNE
reality is the keyword oi the
two rock presidential nomination conventions scheduled here
for April 18-20. And while plans
are not being made at this
time to broadcast either of
them In color, the conventions
are so real that the number of
friendships being displayed be.
cause of political finally is only
extended by the number displayed by the recent student
government elections
Heading the list of attractlions are the two keyword
speakers. For the Democrats
the keyword speaker is Richard
G. Hotelier, Mayor oi Gary, tndiimﬂ, for the Republicans the
keynoter is John H. Chafee,
Governor at Rhode Island.
further is the Iii-st metro
mayor ct Gary and one at the
first metro motors or a major
U.S, city. A power-ml and effective speaker, watches- overcome both Republican and
Democratic opposition to be—
come Gary's mayor. watches
will presumably address himself to the critical situation in
the urban ghettos, a situation
made more critical by the re—
cent investigation of Dr. Martin Luther King.
Chatee is Chairman of the Rev
publicly investors' Association, This group or moderator
would have liked a governor
nominated, say, for instance.
Romney or powerseller. Now
they may have to be content
with making "moderate” the
Republican platforms. Their
voice in these matters has
grown in recent years. Hence
the role that chapel: will play
In the upcoming "real" conven—
tion will be or great importance,
Those two addresses will
mark the end oi any restrict—
ed air at cosinopolitanism and
the various indicating of convention politics as it is known
at Grillnell will begin.
For the Democrats a tough
tight between McCarthy and
Kennedy is predicted. However,
LBJ’s campus campaign chairman Larry Fellerntan, who in»
state that he is a serious supported oi Johnson, is not about
to throw in the tower, even
though his candidate currently
has. Mike Dejoie’s floor managing or the Wallace candidate
must be suspected oi being
something less than wholehearted,
Prominent campus political
disorders, when asked about
the Republican convention,
would no more than serum their
providers and ask it soil while
Ed the nomination. Well known
political phrases like “wide
open convention” were centered around a lot. Names like
powerseller, Lindsay, and mercy got centered around somewhat, [00.
But all ot this just goes to
show that like the “real” nomination conventions this summer
.lt’s, anyone's ball game,
gsm of these conventions is organize william McMairis. domains has been the organize at
several “real" national conventions.
in switch form this is how
both of the two conventions
will run:
The keyword address will be
delivered. Then debate on the
piatiorlns by the generates will
begin. Debate here, as noted
on the official schedule, is ex- ,
posted to center around the
war in Vietnam and the war in
the Cities Amendments, in
wi‘allen form, from [he generates, will be related and
voted upon and finally a platform will be adopted
The next order of business
will be the nomination
speeches for President. This is
followed, of course, by the roll
call voting of the state obligations.
A light may develop over the
certain portions or the rules
governing conduct of the voting. There are two possible
ways for a delegation to' vote:
As a whole, that is, the major»
its of the delegation building
who Shall get all of that dell«
nation’s votes (called unit rule)
or the delegation may be split,
that is live Votes (or one cars
update, ten for another, etc. In
most conventions either the
unit rule or the split deliver
iron rule applies.
At the rock Conventions at
Grinnell, as [he rules read how,
each delaware votes. on each
roll call (several may be
needed to pick a winning can.
didaie), whether it shall be
governor by the unit rule or by
the split style.
Following the nomination of
a residential candidate are
the nomination speeches and
voting for a Vice Presidential
candidate
The reasons for participating
in the rock political conventions- are varied. One argument
goes that it is a good way to
get publicity for a particular
point of view. That is, a “peace
candidate" and a i‘a d i c 81
“peace" platform would be
good publicity for that point of
View. To a limited extent [his
is the case. However, press
coverage of previous conventions has been limited almost
exclusively to town papers. The
more massive of the media
have been enthilSlasth in their
disregard for the political con—
corn and belief OI Grinlleil students.
A better argument can be
made for the familiarity with
the convention system that
these rock conventions provide. The convention, with all
its earnings, is a common
American political tool (AbeLCIO and the DAR both have
conventions that are governor
by much the same set of principles — or lack thereof) and
one who anticipated taking
part in american political life
would he in an advantageous
position to understand what
really gets I! candidate nominated. In bus respect the rock
nomination conventions til-a
very real indeed and a valu-.
able experience no matter how
Til the add t9 the train-MW
Ehlm
(Continued from rage I)
and "hey, hey, LBJ, why didn‘t
you quit before today?"
ENDORSE LBJ’s
NON-CANDIDACY
Student press reaction was
also added’anime. The university at Michigan Daily in ii
front page editorial said Johnson's withdrawal “should not
observe the historic significance
or his plastic administration"
and called on ills processor to
make mayor changes in U.S.
policy.
The Yale Daily News said
“we enthusiastically enlarge
LBJ’s non-candidate.”
Some college editors, such as
those at the UCLA Daily brain,
said they might find It easier
to enlarge Minnesota Senator
Eugene McCall-thy now, since it
is no longer necessary to stop
Johnson.
JOB HARDER
Leaders at the New Lett saw
Johnson’s withdrawal both helps
ing and hunting their efforts.
For example, disorders in
California thought Johnson’:
withdrawal might help me
Peace and Freedom Movement
themes The PFM has been
ﬁrating an effort to get its
members to ste-register as
Democrats to vote for Kennedy
or McCarthy in order to defeat
Johnson The PFM put ottt a
statement saying that now that
Johnson is stopped, opponents
of the war Should remains in the
PFM.
And Lee Webb, one of the organizing oi the counterconveiitron planned for Chicago at the
time of the Democratic convention, said .TOhnSDnS’ Withdrawal would keep the Let:
prot-o supporting McCarthy and
Kennedy as much as they have
and that it would also allow the
campaign to focus on the issues, instead of Johnson'li personality, He mounted that it
would hurt the felt’s plans at
the convention.
But Ray Mllngo, editor at
generation News service in
Washington and another planner of activities for the convention; said. “It makes our
job harder. We have to pursuant people that everything is
still the same.”
CONVENTION
FRAUD
Shortly before Spring Bi'en’
students found a short on
better “export" of the unborn:
ing rock conventions.
DID YOU KNOW THAT—-
.THOUSANDS OF DOLLAR!
i being spent to hold and pubs
licize a rock political concerts
lions . and that the plans
farms and presidential can“:
dates were decided months ago,
“It was thought up by Bob
Hodlerne," admin Gilmuili‘, DI.sector of PPE admitted to th5
5&3 Wednesday night, “and
carried out within the monica
at our own group." it who
planned as a publicity make
Many concern workers ii-o
famous camps text resulted,
however.
In the listing containers'
he received, “I francis [Us
to cover up." His participation
in the affair was recovered b
Jane Parish, who asked Ernl
Renaud ol the Post julie. who
distributed the notices.
"We thong‘it It would DE
best to let the matter drop“
concluded Gilmuur.
Ilmlliitlllllllllllllllliilllllilllltllllllliilllliitlllllllllliilltliillllllllllllllllllilllllillllliilllilillllllillltiitllllitlllllllllllllllllittllliiillllillllllltlltlilllilitlllilitlllliltlltiitllllllllllilllltiilllllili litlllllltlllllllllilllililllltililltiitlllllltlll
Conventions elsewhere
OTHER MOCKS y FAVOR MCCARTHY
from generation News Service
Student residential and much
conventions are showing support for liberal candidates and
general opposition to the war
in Vietnam.
Only a new computer have
held conventions and reference
so far this year. Several more
are scheduled and there will
be a national campus presidential primary and references on the war on April 24o
Students have been leading
toward Senator Eugene McCarthy (D-Minn.) among the Democrats. He has won every democratic lefemndum held so for.
at such computer as the University at Oregon, George
Washington University, Middlebury college in Vermont, and
the university ct North Caro
julia.
At Oregon, Middlebury, and
North Carolina McCarthy beat
both President Johnson and
New York Senator Robert Kenr
nedy. Kennedy was second at
Oregon and Middlebury but
only third at North Carolina
The George Washington vote,
which was actually a poll, gave
McCarthy 65 per cent while 81
per cent of the student’s opposed reflection of President
Johnson.
Oil the Republican Side, there
is no clear trend Former Vice
president Richard simon Won
the nomination at a rock convention at the University of
Chicago involving 22 Young R9political Clubs in the Midwest
and primarily at North CR“?line and Rio Grande College in
Ohio. '
further» York covered Nd- "
son powerseller won primarily
at Oregon and Middlebiuy and
captured the nomination at a
rock convention at the University of Missouri. Notre Dame
students nominated Oregon
Senator Mark Hatfield over
both powerseller and simon at
a convention in which the vote
was seen originally as a protest
against the Vietnam war.
onetnuc session
Organ Music
Grcentlcld, '70
Gary. indiana
Convention access
Foreign Policy"
trials”
Convention access
Parliamentarian
Adoption or me platforms
convention access
presidential NominationPresltienttnl following
invention Adlournrnent
Welcome and acknowledgements.
Director, Program in practical political Education
Remarks by Temporary president o/tiger, Thomas A.
Campus polls Butler college
in indiana, King’s College in
New York, North Carolina, Oregon, Middlebury, George Washington. showed students opposite the war. But students also
opposed lrnmedlato withdrawal
as a solution to the war in
polls taken at the University
of Texas, King's College, and
Colorado State University.
Nwwvavwwwvn
Democratic rock Convention
WEDNESDAY, APRIL I7
Afternoon, counter sounds
Final Session, Platform Committee
THURSDAY. APRIL 19
mo pm, party symposium
Eden Gllvnour.
helen or cradenllnls committee
depot ct Rules committee
Report or Committee on Permanent organization
introduction or keyword Speaker. Hon, Clark discussed,
chairman, Democratic State Central Committee or 10th
keyword Address: Hon. Richard G. further, Mayor or '
9:30 pm, party symposium
Plnllolm session 1. Hon Paul rranzenbul-g, Treasurer. Stun
or lotus, president sun, Eugene in, Hill, state senator.
'I‘\sent)‘»faith District or laws
Remarks by president Oltlcer
Report oi rtnrtorm committee
lot-date and millions on platform plans on “Vietnam and
, Parliamentarian
Debate and following on bistronn plans on “Thu urban
FRIDAY. APRIL I?
9:30 a,m., party symposium
realtors session it. Thomas A. Grceutteld, president. not, or
room Gllmour, department of political Science.
Debate and following on renlolnillg plnnkr oi platform
1:30 p.m., party symposium
nomination Session. lion. Roblzrt D. button. Lieutenant
Governor of Iowa, training. root. calcium A. Nelson.
Department of English, Pnrllnmeniarlun
Rumnrkl by president oulcer
rico Presidential nominations '
Xian presidential following
 
Friday, April it. I763
chairman lancaster
SCARLET AND BLACK
GRINNELL CONVENTION WRAPPED IiP
By RUSS ELLIOTT
5&3 Staff Writer
Monday, in a random poll<
aug of kitty students by the
5&3. Senator Eugene McCarthy
(D.4Minn.) and Governor
Nelson powerseller (IL—NY.)
emerald as the probably nomlnees from their respective
knock presidential conventions.
Students were asked: “If you
could register for a presidential
primary, with which party
would you register?” at percent replied Democratic, 26
percent Republican, and in per.
cent independent or undefined.
when asked: “If you could
vote for President, whom would
you vote for?”
McCarthy pulled 54 percent,
Kennedy 12 percent, Johnson 2
percent, powerseller pulled l2
percent. simon 10 percent; lit
percent were undefined.
to two other 5&3 polls, over
iltiy state delegation chairman
were asked to predict whom
their delegation would vote for.
The poll oi Republicans
sh o w e d powerseller leading
with 15 states and 470 delaware
votes. His closest final was
Nlton with three states and
62 delaware votes. followed by
Hatfield With one state and
three delaware votes. Three
states and All delaware votes
were recommended.
In the Democratic poll, Mcrai-thy leads with 16 states and
888 delaware votes, followed by
ltennedy with three states and
222 delaware votes, Wallace with
one state and 32 delaware votes,
and 13 states and 500 delaware
votes recommended.
CANDIDATES CHANCES —
THE REPUBLICANS
We asked each campaign
i
3
Republican rock Convention
WEDNESDAY. APRIL I7
Altemoon.
Final Session, P
FRIDAY.
0:00 p.m., party symposium
opening session
organ Music
Welcome and acknowledgeinenti, C. 2dwln Gilmour,
Director, Program in pr
Remarks by temporary president oitlccr, Michael J. pill. '00
Report or Credentiaii committed
depot oi Rules Committee
Report or committee on permanent etganlznilon
introduction or Keynote Speaker: Hon. Jack written,
Chairman, republican St
Keynote Address: Hon, John H. Cnafee. Governor at
Rhode island
Convention access
0:30 pm, party Gymuos
Platform Session I. Hon. John Kyl. 01!. Representative,
Fourth District oi iowa.
l-non. Kenneth honda, State Senator, Twenlyvtttlrd District
of Iowa, parliamentarian
Remarks at president will
Report or pistidrm Committee
Debate and following on
Foreign Policy"
Debate and following on platictni plans on “The urban
Crisis"
Convention access
SATURDAY. APRIL 20
3:30 a.n1., party symposium
platform session it. Michael
poor. C. Edivin Gilmour, Department at political Science,
parliamentarian
Debate nmi following on remaining plants oi platforms
Adoption or the platform
Convention access
1:30 pm, party Gymuas
nomination session. l-ioli, Max Milo Mills, State Senator.
Twenty-fourth Senatorial
Plot. William S. Vanderpc
Theatre, parliamentarian
Rcrnarks by president oiilcur
presidential nominations
presidential following
Vice presidential Nontlnatlbno
Vlcc presidential following ,
Convention measurement
chairman to look into the future
and predict how his candidate
will I10 in convention. Here are
a ice comments from Republican chairman:
Jon R o y a l, watson sopho.
more, on powerseller.
“I I‘hlnk that powerseller will
come out of Convention around
the third ballot. simon forces
1 don't think are that strong.
Other candidateswill be trying
to make strong settings early
so that they might have a chance
[or the VicerPreSidentrial nomr
italian.
Fred button,
man, on simon:
“Grinnell does not around
with Students (or simon, Yet
his small cdnlmgency is der
voted and determined.
“If he \vlns, it Will be on
the third or fourth ballot.
”A lot OI kinds haven’t given
him a Chance. His most img
contact concern iS the urban
crisis, and in Vietnam his desire is lot peace.”
Richard White, Cowles fresh»
man, on Reagan:
“I‘m really not sure how
things will go. i doubt very
much oi getting the provided.
tlal nomination, but I’m hoping [or the vice-presidential.”
“Hopefully, it it’s a close
race, I would be able to cover
enough generates and hold out.
I need support."
loans Sydow, years senior.
oil Hatfield:
“We‘re getting a lot of pen«
pie on the first ballot—just to
show his strength. Then we
want to get him on the ticket
BS vice-Presidential dominant"
“His opponent will be mercy
—mercy has a lot at big-state
Clark {rest-
South lounge
lhtlorm Committee
APRIL l9
ncilcal political EduCntlm
ate centsﬂ committee at law:
cum
president
car
platform player on “Vietnam and
1, pin, president
cum
District of Iowa, president
oi, Department or Speech and
QWWQMMWMWWW
delegation leaders backing him.
It could be close."
Frank Thomas, Cowles freshman, on mercy:
“He is today one of the most
important young llgui‘es on the
political scene.
War" and to rid Americans DI
“preceding and evaluation."
CANDIDATES CHANCES —THE DEMOCRATS
Here are a few comments
from the Democratic chairman:
Jim llarmg, w est morris
and the each Political Conventions, will deliver the opening address to the rock Delnocratic Convention.
Later in the program the
keyword speaker, Hon. Richard
a. listings, mayor or Gary,
will address the Convention.
The first metro mayor in
Indiana’s history, watches‘ is
presently in his first year of
office.
He was elected to the City
Council in '63, and led the ligllL
for one oi the best. open 00'
cupancy laws in the nation.
The passage oi that law has
resulted in integrated public
houses in Galy.
 
GOVERNOR John Chaiee, oi rhode island, and mayor Richard watches, oi Gary, indiana, will be the keyword speakers
at campus Republican and Democratic conventions.
Ireshmall, on Kennedy:
“Kennedy is the only white
American who can claim a file
sitlon of leadership as well as
respect among the metro population of this country.”
“Kennedy has proved hinlself to be a leader and an
initiated in progressive legislation. . t I believe he can
and will win."
Phil Bertentttal, North counter senior, on McCarthy:
"I think we'll Win. But I'm
not sure of it at all.”
“I think we've lost support
in the last couple of weeks.
If we work hard, we'll will."
Andrea funny. barnes Sophomore, on Dick Gregory:
“I'm very iatalistic. I just
got the buttons last week, but
before we can really work, we
need printed materials that
simply haven't come yet.”
Tom Greenﬁend, North counter sophomore and Chairman
of the rock Democratic corporation, on President Johnson:
“Johnson’s withdrawal had a
peculiar client on the Grinnell
campus. Although he was only a
minor Candidate, with little
chance oi getting any signsﬁ—
cant support at Grinnell, his
withdrawal seemed to bring the
long silent Grinnell Kennedy
[action out of its reservation."
”All. of a Sudden the RFK
people saw victory—deﬁlikely at
Chicago and maybe at Grinnelll"
“The McCarthy campaign is
directed by a small group oi
students who have come to call
themselves “the privilege political Machine.”
“Unless the Kennedy camp
can throw them on balance,
it's McCarthy for President."
Thursday evening. April ‘18,
Professor C. admin GllmDuri
Director of the programs'ot
Practical Political Education
Opposed by the entire City
machine, including the leaders
oi his own party, he went on
in '67 to defeat the incorrect
mayor and a well-known buS<
inessmaii to gain the Democratic natural nomination.
Friday night at the Republican rock Convention, Hon.
John H. Chafee, Governor OI
Rhode Island, will deliver the
keyword speech.
Chafee is presently chairman
of the Republican Governor’s
Association and the Republican
coordination Committee.
First serving as a Representative to the General Assembly of Rhode Island in '56.
praise was elected Governor
in '62 by a 398 vote margin.
Ill ’64 realize, a Republican,
was elected to a second term
by featuring 61 percent of the
vote, while President Johnson
was sleeping the state with
81 percent, his highest percentage for any state.
Also during the Conventions
the Platform statements will
be read, amended, and finally
approved.
Reasoning that ”you can't
translate respect,” the Republicans call for the repeat oi
the law that hobbies burning
or otherwise tlesecratlng the
American Flag. They propose
ways to improve the flight ol
the American indian and guarantee warrant workers.a uni—
form minimum wage.
The Democrats seek a gilars
allowed minimum income for all
people, while they ilatly “new
source“ the South African government for apartment.
On Vietnam the Republicans
call for “an Immediate sensitive and informational nigeria.
tions," while the Democrats say
“the United States should arrange immediately with the
National generation Front lfor
its moreover of the South Vietnamese government."
Page Seven
TIME’S
MOGK
PRIMARY
By PHIL SEMAS
Collegiate Press Service
In any election year there all
always numerous rock primarily and elections on college
computer.
In 1968 these llldivIdunI local
primarily will be pushed into
the background by Choice ‘68,
a national primary to be held
April 24 on more than 1,000
college computer.
The organizing oi the on.
mary say they already have
1,100 schools with four-andy
half million students signed up
to participate, including almost
all of the large schools. They
hope to have at least 1,500,
which would give them a patent
dial electorate of time-and-arhall
million. That would make it
the second largest pnmary in
the nation (after California’s).
Some have predicted that they
will get close to 2,000 schools,
which would be nearly every
college in the country.
Choice '65 is the idea of Bob
Harris, a former Michigan again
University student body president. It occurred to him last
summer that, instead of a haphazard group ot local primarily,
college students ought to veto
at the same time in one national primary.
He then started going to
various companies to see if ho
could get money to finance the
program. The ﬁrss place he
went was Time magazine main.
ly “because i could get in to
See the publishers" Time Put)—
fisher James samples decided
In about IO minutes that it will
a good idea, so Time sent harris
to so computer to talk to std.
cents and see if the idea will
possible.
FUNDED HY TIME
other that trip, Time decided
it could be done and gave Harris $100,000 for the project “an
a public service." He picked it
student leaders to make policy
Ind determine the billion
But being funded by Tim il
a problem for Choice ’68. Time’s
editorial treatment oi students,
education, and Vietnam has not
exactly made it flexible to
many college students and semi
DI that lack of flexibility may
run off on Choice ’68.
But Harris says Time ha:
given him and his board of dis
sectors complete control over
policy. “They do exercise que].
its control over how things are
written and so forth," he says,
“but they let us decide on base:
approaches and policies."
Harris also points out that
there has been no coverage pl
Choice ’68 in Time, except in
Shepley's “publisher's letter"
on the table-respondents page.
The project wash’t announced
in Time and neither will [ha
results of the election be allnouilcei‘l there.
Harris is trying to set up I
"30 or ﬁtribute television Sp5«
dial” to announce the results.
The student body president!
and college editors who malta
up the board were identical oi
Time when they first met last
October, but they say that they
CHOICE—
(Continued on Page 15)‘
 
Page Eight
SCARLET AND BLACK_
Friday, April 12, I958
 
And on the Populist—Welfurisi nickel‘ . . .
HE—
AN HOUR hills GEGRGE WALLACE I.
By Wm. F. BUCKLEY, Jr.
A month or so before George
Wallace Conﬁreed that he
would run for President on a
third party ticket, the right
wing weekly journal, Human
Events, published the results of
a poll of “two hundred prominent conversations." The poll
unearthed a surprising mortality
towards George Wallace.” Why?
.i asked him a few weeks ago.
S Well, Mr. Buckley said that two-hundred prominent conversations — that‘s typical
of those who write in
magazines — who
are these prominent
conversations?
Moderator: Mr. Buckley, did the magazine
list the conversations?
B: No, it didn’t. But
suppose Governor Wallace names one prominent conservative outside the South who’s in
favor of him?
6W: Mr. Buckley, 1
run my politics like i do
in Alabama. l never
went to the County
Court Houses to see [he
the county governing
bodies. l just went to
the people. i go out to
the passes of the people with the message
that l have, and i don’t
know any prominent
conversations.
i tried to suggest that the
reason why prominent conversations do not. enlarge
George Wallace is because they
do not believe that his activities
are in the conservative tradition, Sophisticated conversations
believe that Wallace's passion
for states rights derived mm
the knowledge that this is the
only way to administer a segregated state.
Mr. Wallace replied that an
enormous number or degrees
voted for his will. Governor
surgeon Wallace, at the last
election, that he is no longer a
member of the official democratic establishment, that he
broke with John Kennedy alter
his election, and did not vote
for Johnson in 1964. And any»
way, what could a conservative
ﬁnd to criticism in his program
for Alabama?:
GW: Name one thing
in Alabama that l have
supported on the modern<
mental level that you
are against.
H: You want (the
state) to take care of
hospitalization, y o u
want to take care of
old people, you want
to take care of the
poor . . .
cw: Are you against
caring [or the poor and
the old?
(i thought perhaps
that Mr. Wallace would
brandon the technique
if 1 dedicated it, so I
answered mocksolemniy, “I hate the
poor." it didn’t for
GW: 1 am for looking after institute elderly people. I’m not as
gained that at all. So
if conservation is
against looking alter
the elderly who are institute, i might say that
no conservative in this
country who comes out
against looking after
institute elderly per—
pre, ought to be elected
to anything.
Moderator: Let‘s get
it definitely from Governor Wallace, whether he
is a conservative, or
presents to be a conservative.
B: He calls himself
a playlist.
cw: If you mean (by)
a playlist a man of the
people, yes, I’m a playlist, if that’s what you
mean by it. . .Let’s get
back to the old age pensions. Let's see, you’re
against Alabama’s looking after the elderly,
institute citizens ol the
state?
I had observed that Mr. Wallace, like most. minerals, favors
federal welfare programs — but
then results Washington’s interference. He replied that Alabama was only getting back
in welfare What. Alabama put
out in federal taxes. Partly
true, I agreed, but in fact Alabama got more back from the
government than Alabama gave
to the government, by a long
sight . . . He is extremely defensive on this point:
GW: Where are your figures? You‘ve made ii
charge against Alabama,
give us the figures . . .
b: My guess is that you
take in at least five times
Is much brown the Federal
Government as you send
out in taxes.
6W: . . . that’s totally
unique.
n. l happen to know the
figures for Mississippi directly, ten to one: that’s why
I sort of cut that in hair.
ow: It’s not ten to one
in Mississippi in the first
place. 1’" say that’s wrong
(The current figures on Mississippi and Alabama are: Mississippi puts up aspects for
every dollar she brings in
from the Federal Government.
Alabama puts in sl-cents, Still,
it is a good economic bargain.)
So it went. Mr. Wallace
seemed to be arising that state
mechanism is altogether ,devil»
able, provided the relevant administrative 'unit is the state,
not the Federal Government.
He seemed movie saying that
something suddenly happened
half way through John gonna
dy's align that certified his sudden distinction with the national Democratic Party. But that
whatever it was that happened,
it had nothing to do with the
race question, and that the
vote oi so many degrees
for surgeon Wallace shelter
him of any nutrition that his
program is based on race.
We have seen that George
Wallace shortly assists that he
is not to be thought or as a raclst candidate, even though he
has never explained satisiactorily why he was an enthusiastic national Democrat, in the
SuJiTEE
tradition or Roosevelt, Kennedy,
and Johnson, up until the moment when the Federal Government began to interface with
the will of Alabama on the
matter of legislation,
It is not as though, when
Governor Wallace stood at the
threshhold of the University of
Alabama and denied the federal
martial to carry out the court
order integrating the university, he there and then repeated
of his former activities, per.
ceiling the implications of state
mechanism.
"supplies to be perfectly
satisfied for Washington to col-
left taxes and remix the proceeds to the states — provided
there are no accompanying instructions on how that money is
to he used. He is quite prepared
to accept, for Alabama, twice
as much money as Alabama
contributed to the federal treasury. What he is not prepared
to do is acquiesce in washington’s instructions on how Ala-
basic should run its school system, or indeed anything else
that Alabama aims, their her
(m the question of race legislation.
What will prove especially
interesting about George Wallace in the months to come is
less his Views (he has adopted
the full paraphernalia of the
alternative, even though he is
a \terrorist-playlist, catalogue
by his passion for racial legislation) than his techniques.
Here, as I discovered, are a
few of them.
1. EXAGGERATING THE
SOUTH’S FLIGHT.
6W: . . . we had five
generations of people who
didn’t. go to school-because
there were no schools it)!
black or white. All they
could do is eye something
out of the ground to eat . . .
(There were public schools in
Alabama, and for that matter
private schools, during the live
generations in question.)
2. 50’s YOUR OLD MAN.
Buckley: . . . Certiiln pop.
italiano grew up in th- -
South and listed for participation in a type of government which is (listinclively
anti-conservative, the type
oi government of which Mr.
Roosevelt and Mr. Kennedy
and Mr. Johnson are (rep«
reservation). Then all of a
s u d d e n, something has—
peter. The consequences of
that rehabilitation all is
meant that they coupon’t
continue in their segregated
ways, and that‘s when pokemon Wallace was box—
GW: Of course, I was not
even voting in the days that
you’re talking about, i
didn’t even vote In those
elections, but when you say
that, because of the people
of the South voted for Mr.
Roosevelt that made them
anti-conservative, Well New
York voted for Mr. Roosevelt all four times . . .
s . . It dress’t make any
difference to me whether
some prominent conservative is not for me. 70% of
the people last night on a
poll on the television station
in St. Louis said they would
support me. The fact is that
i won the television poll on
WIIC in Pittsburgh the other day and detected John<
son, Kennedy, and Reagan
by almost three to one.
B: And they might have
given more votes to aaron
than they did to you, right?
6W: That‘s a real smart
power.
a: We know that he got
many more votes in Argentina) than you got in Al—
drama.
aw: i got more in Alabama than you got in New
York.
3. NOBODY-EVERLETS-ME-TALK.
GW: Why don’t you let
me talk? After all . . . I
thought you invited me to
get my opinion . . . Really,
i thought i was supposed to
—- you wanted my opinion.
But when you get on this
show, the man that puts on
the show wants to do all
the talking. (At that point
in the program, by exact
count from a transcription,
the moderator had spoken
in words, I had spoken 169,
and Wallace 845.)
I. THERE-AlN’T—NOBODYLOVES-THE-NIGRAsLlKEME-AN’-LURLEEN.
GW: In fact, we don't have
legislation in Alabama . . .
i've always made speeches in
my state in which i said any»
body’s entitled to vote regard.
less of their race or color . . o
and we had metro citizens by
the thousands who Voted in
1958, when I first ran for governor, and I might say, In the
run-off for governor, that they
voted for me,
E: is that because they didn’t
have the education you‘re law ing about?
6W: You reflect on the No.
bio voters of Alabama if yo
want toybut >1 won't; ' ‘_ 2-
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page wins_
 
Friday, April l2, I‘ibBr
By BARRY ANCONA
l have noted that touring companies performances at Grinhell have always produced an coordinate amount of applause. 1
think I know why. The country kids are glad to have any expo«
sure to culture, and the City kids, normally started out here, are
keen for any recorders of home.
This may seem a very Stucksup, better-than-thou attitude.
It is.
Wicked City is a touring company — a New York show on
the road. Maybe you got a climate oi it Visiting the big town, but
let me tell you: New York is a great place to live, but i worlds’t
want [0 Visit.
To really appreciate the wicked city e any wicked city —
you have to live in it; feel it in you as you try to find white you're
about.
When you grow up in a small town, as you get older, you
get to know more and more people in the town. When you grow
up in a city, as you get older you get to know more and more
people, but you also meet thousands of people you don’t know.
This is the challenging thing about life in the city 7 the people
you meet every day that you don’t know, that you will never
see again.
It’s trighteiiing when you are united, a block from your home,
by someone you have never seen before. It’s a relief to know you
may never see him again. it’s exciting to meet some girl you’ve
never seen before. And depression to think you may never see
her again.
But that's what Wicked City is all about. The high school
pass, and girls next door, and every smalHown way of life is
there, but it's spreading the make of interference and convenience,
the long sunday ride home, that makes the city unique.
I'm going to talk about a certain sunday line. i used it frequently during my senior year in high school. Mostly between
midnight and 3 am.
it would be nice to think that l was travelling long distances
to now my wild cats far from home, but it was just convenience
that almost every girl i knew lived in the West front, just off
the become Avenue line (That meant a 45 minute sunday ride
Ind a lo minute walk to get home),
Of course. these were Wicked City girls, They were my age
(15) or a bit younger. They did not go to my high school (it was
all boys). They were all bright. And pretty good-looking. And all
had some screen hang-up. i mean screen. Nothing ordinary in
hang-ups car them.
One girl had a mother who was trying to act the age that the
girl was, and correspondingly tried to make the girl look and act
like a live-learned. One girl had a Jewish father and a Catholic
mother who got disorder. The father then married a protecting.
The girl also wanted to be a ballet cancer. But her build (about
five feet tall, and lives proof that the cantilever principle works),
although quite appearing. was not cut out, so to speak, for ballet.
One girl had a great home life, and was happy in her work and
play, and could have passed for Nancy Normal, if she hadn't been
a bit hungary because she was rated when she was eleven.
My only hanging was that I was hung on girls with hangrups.
A real social worker. With a few interior notices
But back to that sunday. it would be possible, I imagine, to
have three such girls living on three blocks of Main Street, print
hell. But to come and go with each one without detection by the
others would require travelling through the fewer system and
posting out of included storm trains. That’s kind of what the
sunday is.
The become Avenue line is not a sunday at all in the front
— it is an operated. The station platforms bizrate as trains pass.
You can look down between the ties to the street below, or, over
your shoulder, into Somebody’s apartment. Most of the platform
is recovered — you can wait twenty minutes in a blizzard for
a train.
When you ride a sunday train at night, you ride in either the
first or the middle car. The motorola is in the first, and the
conducted in the middle. This was in the days before policemen
code the trains. I was five [eat four inches in those days.
it's different now. When i drive my car in the city, I feel I've
turned it. It's so safe and isolated in a car. But park the Car and
walk a block and the old feeling is back.
There is a challenge to walk a straight line, with unexpected
pleasure and pain looking right and left. And when you realize
that y’ou’must expect the unexpected, 'you have submitted to the ,
urst initiative site oi the Wicked- City. Enjoyt
You M y Be Next
iii USTBlAL CIA STA S RADiCALS
By JEANNE VANDERVOORT
of the 5&E’s Chicago Bureau
The American Security Coun—
oil, not to he confused with the
National Security Council, has
its headquarters in an unmarked gray building on North
hacker Drive in Chicago.
There is no listing for the
first five floors on the operator
directory; the sixth floor houses
the American Security Council
and the seventh ﬂfor, the l selection for the Study of American Strategy.
The Council was formed in
l955 as an organization through
which the private sector of the
society might help to meet the
Communist challenge in the
cold war. It is still Concerned
with meeting the Communist
challenge.
Explains John M. Fisher,
President of the ASC,:
“The A m e r i c a n Security
Council is a private organize-
' n fact, now its a corner-
Tlie organization in c l u d e 3
among its members companies,
foundations, universities and
college and private institutions
(working together to meet their
responsibilities in the interests
of national security, says some
of the literature of the orgasm.
nation.)
Security checks, either on
employees or associates, are
run by the Council for its member businesses.
“We‘re notre a r t l s a n, of
course," says Fisher. “We are
Interested only in a person’s
background; whether it. is [all
or right.”
Students who participate in
concentrations or Sign positions
or complexity statements get into
the organizations files.
According to mandate McChesney, a barnes sophomore
who worked in the Council’s
offices last year, several Grin.
well students were on file.
Information and names are
obtained from magazine and
newspaper buildings.
These are stored in the research center library, a large
room with few windows.
An index of over Six million
cards and stocks which Con—
main hundreds of publications
llllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
Book Review
DADA, ART AND ANTI-ART
By ROBIN STANDISH
LIBERATION News Service
Dada, Art and Anti-Art.
Hans fighter. lvlccraw i-iili.
53.95 paperback.
Dada represents an unfinished revolution in art, one
that our movement artists today are continuing. Dada was
a great era when art was an
organic part or the artist‘s
life; artists were not afraid to
make a statement, they wanted
to communicate on Vital levels, and art gave meaning to
their lives. Arr, llle. and revolution were united. The publication ol l-land fighter's magnificent book. Dada, Art and
Anti-Art is an important event,
for Dada raises some vital
questions not only about art,
but about life and revolution.
We who are Movement people, following the lead of the
anarchists and other recently—
lists and libertarians, are becoming more and more coitcerned to live our revolution.
We are seeking to build a life
which is registration before
(or at least at the same time
as) i! is revolutionary, a life
which creates the new, in our
own lives, while it desktops
the delay in society (and in
our own lives). Can this be
done? Or is a whole, registration life hypothetical to a
struggle for massive social
Change?
We all know what happened
in prerNazi Germany. The Dadaists did not prevent either,
and neither did deeply antiNazi people who withdrew from
the struggle both psychically
and physically to live begin»
ei'alive lives in rural infections
al communities such as the
Bruderhot. Yet both groups after us some clubs.
some people are seeking
rural communities which will
maintain Itmnz ties with the ‘
city, with a lot or movement
back and forth, as people work
in free universities, guerilla
theater, etc, Some will manage
to make their peace With the
city, finding registration lives
with or without community. For
some people, art offers its
own answer, Yea—saying Dada
was concerned with the reports
of society. Art of this nature
is revolutionary; it gets in
people’s gets. Art as the com—
medication of life, art as an
extension of self to others,—
art from community in the
form or guerilla theater, music,
painting, whatever—such art offers a synthesis of a registration lite and revolutionary social change. When this happens, we are picking up on the
unﬁlisted revolution of Dada.
Dada, Art and Anti-Art is a
loving account by one of Dada's
creature, hence its vitamins and
spirit. This is nu mere similarly history, though it processes
that element too. The book is
filled with pictures, some in
color. There is a good selection of drawings and posters,
and even some poetry and short
plays. in addition there are
pictures of the artists, and it
is a great delight to find that
Hans rrp looks like his work.
The $3.95 paperback is a version of a gorgeous s50 cards
back, an awesiuspiring book
that good public libraries should
have.
fighter, with Hugo Ball,
clara, lluelsenbeck, rrp and
several Others originally Dada
in about 1916. Cnaracteristicale
ly, they disturbed actively about
the origin at the word “data.”
fighter’s explanation, the loveliest one, i think, is that it
items from hazard and dance’s
Rumanlau ‘da-da,‘ an improving expression that accepted
DADA— -
- (Continued'on Page 12)
occupied the floor space of the
library.
The publications, magazines,
newspapers and newsletters are
a pretty comprehensive sampling of both lighting and baptist
materials printed in the U.S.
claims a spokesman.
Several student newspapers
were apparent in the ﬁles as
were an assurance of SDS,
Dubois, Young Socialist and
various civil rights newsletters.
lighting publications are not
us evident.
Workers in the library under—
line names found in the pub.
locations for future reference.
For example, the name Alan
Jones, author of an article in
the Political Science Quarterly
was understand.
(The Federal Bureau of In.
destination and the Central Intelligence Agency have used
the libraries facilities, says Carr
date.)
A pamphlet entitled: “Just
What is the American Security
Council?” describes the organization:
“Key leaders of commerce
and industry recognized that private businesses have an es
sexually urgent need to rise to
the challenge of communist,
which is dedicated to the
DESTRUCTION oi the tree
enterprise system."
“Accordingly, the American
Security Council was organized
as a non-proﬁt business association to increase awareness
often long term Communist
objectives and to develop new
and original approaches in
counseling communist’s war
to counter the world."
iiiillitiilliiiiiitiiilliiiillliiilliiiiilliiilllliililiiiillililliiiilllliilliiiililn
FEDERAL AID
T0 PEACENIKS
IOWA CITY, iowa (LNS) —
Several groups of University of
loiva students are donation
part of their generally finances
scholarships to antique groups.
Twentyrsix graduate students
with teiiowships trim the National Defense Education Act,
the National institute of Child
Health and Development, and
the National Science Foundation have pleased up to half of
'their monthly checks to “hu-
monitoring relief work in Vietnain" and “legitimate political
distant in the United States.
They say they have collected
more than $500 and that another $1,000 has been pleased.
Three graduate students attend-
‘ log school on the 6! bill said
they would give at least onetenth of their monthly checks
and possibly more.
“The same government which
is paying for our education is
also financing the destruction
war in Vietnam,” the group of
graduate follows said in a state.
ment, “and for us to remain
silent is explicitly to approve
this policy. in view of the re
sponsibility to the United States
to which we are all committed
as’ recipients of government
grants, we have decided that
the most meaningful action we
can take is to donate a portion
 
Page Ten
SCARLET AND BLACK
FARBES: "I AM STILL REBUKED"
‘CHURCHES REFUSE FUNDS APPEAL
OE” RALLY
(Continued from Page 2)
speech here. I told them (the
rally planners) that i didn’t
want to speak,”, Walker began,
“because my words are words
of wilderness and words oi lruslratll‘tn. And this is neither lol
time for words or wilderness
nor for words of irostretions.”
“i don’t expect to live through
the summer," he [old 300 people
sitting on the grass in print
of him, “mainly because I'm
black."
“Violent or non-violent,” Walker continued, “I‘m going to be
our there—1 have to be out
there—because I’m black."
The former Smith hall president told the group that it was
opportunity that days or hours-
ing placed an emphasis on the '
color black “when we are
mounting the death oi a noble
black man."
"We’ve got black suits on
and‘it‘s a black day and everything is black,’ Walker said,
”But Dr. King himself a few
months ago mid America it
ought not to expensive that
Wlor.’
“I didn’t have to come here
In a black suit, all dressed in
black," he added.
“It’s not going to do any good
to grocery Dr. king. That will
be done enough, has been done
enough, all across the country,”
Walker sold.
”it's not going to do any
good to just talk about marketing White America,” he explained. “That's been done
enough!
“Enough of talk," he concluded in a whether. “I want to see
it there‘s my ml concern here
. . ,at crime". . .1 want you lo
do more than talk."
5260 AT RALLY ALONE
SDS members and Thomas
then calculated through the
crowd taking contributions to
pay for the celebrate and in
send to the Memphis garbage
workers.
By the time they had {indexed, they had collected over
$264) from those present at the
rally alone.
An emotional 370 had been
turned over to the rally planners Sunday morning by college Chaplain Dennis Hous—
the collection from the weekly
service in service Chapel.
“I hate being ill Grinnell today," the Rev. Ed Wright, a
former ministerial insert at
Grinneil during the 1964-65
school year and now Baptist
Chaplain at Harvard, had told
the Sunday worshipers in service.
Wright announced the Church
In general and Grinnell churches
in particular at the Sunday
coming service before the
rally. He had come to Grinhell on President suggest’s invitation, he said, and was
checklist at Grinnell on the
national day oi mounting for
Dr. King.
EIGHT CHURCHES SAY “NO”
Only 550 was brought in irnm
Sunday morning collections at
churches in the town of Grlnr
well. According to Joe Berry,
twelve oi Grinnell's fifteen
churches had been called and
asked il a team or one black
girl and one white girl from
the College could attend the
Sunday services at each one
and collect money for the contribution in memorial to Dr.
King.
Eight oi the twelve churches
contacted in town, Berry said,
“. . . gave us a flat ‘NO’ and
hung up the phone.’
As robert Forbes told the
300 persons at the rally:“0n
a day or national mounting I
collected more donations at
Sunday dinner, and a few more
donations trickled In Monday
and during the remainder oi
the week.
By Tuesday morning the collections detailed almost $450 in
paper currency, checks, and
small change. Some of the
checks were made out to the
Southern Christian Leadership
Conference (now), which Dr.
King founded and formerly
headed; some were made out
to “Memphis Garbage Work-
Photo by Alan lasinhardl
"l DON‘T EXPECT to live through the summer, mainly because l’rn black.” Roy Walker told 300 people It Blrber Pin-
u.
“Violent or non-violent, i’m going lo I» out then — I
have to be out there—because I‘m black."
“My words no words of wilderness and words oi arbitration. And this is neither the lamb to: words of wilderness
nor for words of arbitration."
am reduced at half a down
supposed ‘control of coin
science.’ "
“This is a say day," the CBS
president told them “not only
because a noble black man was
shot down in Memphis. . t It
is a sad day because on this
national day at mounting i am
still reduced. p .lt is a sad
day because it took this day
to make our President (Johnson) give official cancer.’
The $50 from local churches
came mainly from three—the
local terrorist church, birth
Ave. at Park St; the First
United Presbyterian Church,
1015 Fifth Ave: and Father
John merger’s St. Paul’s gpl5<
coral Church and Student Cert.
her, Sixth Ave. at State St.
merger and Rev. powell Davis, oi the United Church of
c h r i at (Congregationalist),
Fourth Ave. at Broad St, had
been involved in the February
Town vs, metro Student controversy on campus.
DONATIONS TOTAL 3450
An additional contribution of
around 35 was collected tuesday night by Gtinneli students
from the North Side Friends
conservation, full West St.
Around $40 was sent to SDS
by a conservation in Gilmen.
In, men. miles northwest of
Grinnell.
' Tables outside the dining'halllz
era;” And some to “service
Chapel."
Some contributions came from
town citizens like Bill Weeks,
principal of the local high
school. And some came from
College personnel like Mr. and
Mrs. Stephen Aldrich, resident
advisors in Cleveland hall, who
gave $50 to the cause.
SMALL CHANGE
AND REAL CONCERN
But most came from students
or the rally itself. One white
girl put twelve panties, three
trickles, ﬁvo times, and a
quarter into an envelope and
scrawled on the back “If I can
no instead or give, show me."
She wrote her name and er
tension number on the envelope.
The celebrate to Memphis
were Sent Sunday night. Andy
Loewi sent the check [or $443.78
to the SCLC headquarters in
Atlanta, Ga.. Monday morning.
specilylng it be used to help
the navigation workers' struggle in Memphis.
“Pm somewhat surprised that
there's that much support, that
much concern on this campus,"
barnes told the 58:3 alter the
contributions were counted and
locked in the Forum basement
Sunday ottemoon."
“1 hope," ha added,
response won’t be limited to
“the '
money payments which will believe built feelings."
"(is an unprecendented amount oi contributions for anything ever all Grinnell. it's
amazing," added an snS member.
PETITIONS AND APPEALS
Concern over Martin Luther
King, Jr‘s death, however,
was not limited to communications at the Sunday rally.
Friday - less than twelve
hours alter King‘s assassinatron—Gates freshman Ted click
posted a petition in Cnmegie
basement calling for “prompt,
swift action on the hair housing
bill now under consideration in
Congress.”
"We, the underground stud
cents and faculty of Grinnell
College.” Gilck’s petition lead,
“in despite and narrow over
the arabic murder or Dr. martin Luther King, ask, respect.
and demand that the covering'
body of this country act immediately to end the conditions
in this country which breed
violence nl this sort.”
After asking for immediate
action on the tan llouslng bill,
the petition went- on to . .
desire that more measures be
enabled to bring equality and
freedom [0 all residents of the
United States, no matter what
their color may be."
During the is hours the petition was up in the post since, no students and faculty
members signed it.
Copies of click's petition were
sent Monday to Speaker of the
House John W. McCormack and
Vice President robert Humphrey.
click enclosed a letter with
copies oi the petition. “No attempt to detroit the signatures was made," he explained.
“i am sure that many more
signatures could have been obtained it more effort had been
put into this advertising. But
that fact is inoooscquentia '-
Pine Tree sophomore MarciStill and James sophomore
Nasrln Paklzegi began taking
contributions Monday for the
Poor peoples' March on Washingtull when they appeared
through the campus mall with
hand-cuts.
Sponsored by Martin Luther
King's own SCLC, the Poor
People's March is scheduled to
begin April 22. Thousands or
demonstration are expected to
sit-in in the nation's Capital
City until their demands are
met.
“in order- to go to washington," the Griuneil girls said
in their mailing appeal, “these
people will need food. clothing,
and transportation. They will
be staying there UNTIL SOME ACTION [5 TAKEN.
The length at their stay is therefore unknown,“
CONTROVERSY OVER
CHURCH REBUKE
That churches in the town
of Grillnell “reduced” those
seeking contributions for the
Memphis garbage workers be.
came a rating controversy on
campus beginning Monday.
“1 was at a meeting last
night where i learned about
the adverse response oi some
local churches (mine included)
to a request to seek donations
for the. Memphis garbage collectors," Professor James mls~
same (English) wrote dos Bér-’
ry Monday.
Kiss‘and‘, who customs‘ a do"
Friday, April IZ. lqbl
nation to the Memphis stickers,
is a member of the local Congregationalist c h u r c h A the
United Church of Christ, Fourth
Ave. and Broad St.
“i believe Rev. (Neweli)
DavisAand no doubt others as
wellafeit he after in the only
way he could, given his responsibilities and the short notice
oi the request,” message added.
“I happen to think he (Davis)
made a serious mistake in
this, but more important," message said, “I think is the (act
that his concern about civil
rights in general and his efforts
on behalf 0! decent treatment
of our black students in the
town of Gn'shell have been not
only charitable but outstanding."
“He puts most or us to shame
in this respect,” message
showed. Davis has been in<
solved personally with many or
the metro students on campus
as “friend and mentor.’ according it) one CBS member.
“ii there was going to be a
‘YES' in town—-in addition to
(Father) l-larger— thought it
would have been Davis," added
Sl>S member Berry.
Davis refused a request to
collect contributions at his
church when asked Sunday by
berry. By Monday, however,
the conservation or calls'
Church had sent about $35 in
contributions to H835 to be
given to robert barnes of the
rally group.
CHURCHES, CBS TO MEET
College Chaplain Dennis l-laar
was expected to recommend the
members oi the Grinnell Ministerlal Association (GMA) at
a meeting Tuesday morning at
St. Paul's principal Church—
Father merger's church — at
Sixth Ave. and State St,
According to Joe Berry. Haas
decided Monday night to fell the
Tuesday assembly or local man.
waters that “as far as i am
concerned, you have completely
separated themselves from the
College,"
At the Tuesday meeting, however, Haas didn'o have till
chance or the inspiration to
deliver his recommend. They
began the meeting by visiting
representatives of campus concerned Black Students to a
special meeting of the assocb
onion which will probably bl
scheduled for tomorrow morning, April 13.
Only about mail of the churches
in town are actively represented
in the GMA, which has no national affiliation; several ministers who are active were absent from the Tuesday meet'ng.
Monday night about ﬁgreen
students—mostly degrees—met
in the SGA Board Room of the
Forum basement to draft all
letter concerning the Grlilncll
community churches. The meeting was planned shortly after
the Sunday rally by barnes,
Thomas, and Berry.
The letter—ﬁrally signed by
SDS, Forbes (representing CBS)
and Thomas (representing, he
said, only himself) said the
death “oi Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King was a loss that oh
tests every man, woman, and
child in this country."
"The spirit of that man has
been originally isolated by the
interference of the Grlnnell leaders or that Christian cause for
RALLY~ '-
(Continued on Page 11)
 
Friday, April I2. I?“
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
Sitttwrizrn
him; Mil
MEMPHIS BLUES
 
cum-m was mo new
distributed by Hash-imam“ SYNDICATE
 
In? RALLY
(Continued team page to)
whom he lived and died," It
declared.
CBS RAFS MINISTERS
“We do not intend to tie»
tract Item the fingering of
those churches who did Welcome our representatives in
their services," the letter con»
linked. “But of fifteen
churches in Grinnell, town, one
half ilatly refused to allow the
presence of students to accept
donations or to announce the
rally in support or Dr. King‘s
movement.”
“The certification given by
these factors,” tlte letter explained, “has generally been
the ‘Conservation of establish»
ment autonomy,’ that all requests he cleared through the
administrative apparatus or
their ‘church boards] ”
“Has Christianity in Ameri»
ca degenerated so far that it
has become the product 01
board decisions dependent upon
administrative process?” the
student a u t h o r s rhetoricaliy
ﬁshed.
The letter was sent ID local
ministers Wednesday by robert Forbes.
MEMORIAL SERVICE
DRAWS 509
The day following Dr. King's
investigation. April 5, a mem—
trial service for King was held
in service Chapel on campus
Many processors discussed
their classes to allow students
to attend.
And as the Chapel cells crimes
“GLORY, GLORY, HALLELU.
JAH; HIS TRUTH IS MARCHING 0N,” over 500 people songs-stated in i-leri-ice, Many or
them remained standing through
out the service.
Nearly all of them appeared
mouse and built-hidden.
Sponsored by Haas, who
opened the set-Vice with the Biblical text King used when he
participated in October's Grinnell College corporation.
speakers included metro professor penis the Coteau (MllsiC) nurses; Thomas;
and Chairman oi the Faculty
Joseph F. Wall.
“If Grinnell College will he
remembered—it it is going to be
remembered at all,” Wall [old
the conservation, “it will be
remembered as the place that
gave Martin‘ Luther King a
“my
'-' King/.ggvetthevtiundayturmon ‘
during corporation in a dash—
iiirdash-out appearance October
stix months before his death.
He left Grinnell currently to
serve a live~day sentence in
Birmingham, All—his north
and last prison term for en»
gaming in can-violent civu right
activitiest
KING WARNED GRINNELL
“I never intend to adjust myself to militancy or the seltlacerating effects oi violence,’
King had told the Grinnell
community, ”I constantly raise
my voice against roots. But after counseling roots it is Hebe
essays to concern just as vi.
ciotlsly the conditions that gifts
form under."
People who ignore the could
rights cause, Rev. King had
told the more-than-capacity
crowd or 4,000 in party symposium, “are sleeping through
it revolution."
"Aliy individualaor nation——
today that teens he can live
alone," he had told them, "is
sleeping through a revolution.”
King was awarded an contrary corporate of humans Letters by Grinnell college. his de»
gi'leone oi twenty—one various
contrary degrees awarded to
corporation participants was
presented first at the ceremony
in kai’hy, as the Civil rights
leader had to catch an early
plane to Atlanta.
At. the Friday memorial service in patrick, a visible shared
and better robert Forbes posted
those present when he addressed
himself to “yellow members of
What I might call the Young
metro Intelligentsia."
"Where are you going wllh
your $11,000 education?’ barnes
asked their “fake a few sets
nails and stop your learning. . .
Take a long, hard look at what
lite in white America holds for
you."
“For with the death oi Martin Luther King," the cos
president concluded, “you will
see more total just the death
or a metro leader.”
Fatbes called King “The victim at every white, middleclass American brown San Diego,
california to Brooklyn, New
York. . . to Memphis, Tennessee. . to Grillnell. laura"
“Martin Luther King's consistent ntteinpt to private the
black man, without saudiﬁking
his pride— ‘ ind' dual 'auto»
angry—wgarlewi} «I '
left Ll e ash yesterday in Memphis.”
King was shot twice with a
highrpowei’ed while Thursday,
around 6 pink. Grinnell time,
as he stood on the harmony or
his motel in Memphis. penn, HI
died shortly after being pushed
to a hospital there.
Rev. King, 39, was buried
Wednesday in his native litIanta, 63., at a metro deleted-y near warehouse College
—— is avoid water. Between
100,000 and 150,000 persons gather'ed at the minerals
END or NON-VIOLENCE!
i .As sure as the blood
of a dedicated black man was
skilled in Memphis," Forbes
whispered, closing his islamic
in service Friday noon, “so
the possibility oi peaceful accommodation oi blacks (into
American society) has been
trusted in the eyes or metro
youth."
The Friday service closed
with the conservation of 500
singing one oi Dr, Kings t'avon-its homes—Number 441 in
the College liyritiial:
“ONCE TD EVERY MAN
AND NATION: COMES THE
MOMENT T0 DECIDE; IN
THE STRIFE OF TRUTH WITH
FALSEIIDOD; FOR THE GOOD
0R EVIL SIDE; SOME GREAT
CAUSE, GOD’S NEW MES»
SIAII; OFFERING EACH THE
BLOOM OR BLIGI‘IT; AND THE
CHOICE GOES BY FOREVER;
’TWIXT THAT DARKNESS
AND THAT LIGHT.”
Page line
SORROW, SOME lllOTS
AT OTHER
By WALTER GRANT
JACKSON, Miss, April I)
(CPS) — Black students on
some college computer reached
to the investigation of Dr. Mars
[in Luther King with violence,
but most black students remained peaceful and held memorial services and sympathy
matches.
The administrations DI last
hlaclt colleges cancelled classes
after Dr, King’s death. Classes
also were cancelled at many
approximately white colleges
and universities while memorial
services were being held in campus changes.
Most black students who were
interpreted by CPS said Dr.
King’s investigation already has
contributed to the growth of the
black military movement.
Students who remained peaceful say they did so in respect
for Kings consistent principles,
but most made it Clear.they
think non-violence died with Dr.
King
RIOTS NEAR CAMPUSES
gifts trusted on or near several back college computer
shortly after the investigation.
Students were injured In (Usturbancee on some computer.
' in Tallahasse, ala. a l9»years
old white youth was killed when
students from Florida A&M
University ilrehombed e Whiteowned grocery store near the
campus. A small band of ship-
,era armed with small carrier
guns and one how and arrow
took pot shots at police from
the A&M campus, and two trail—
era near the campus were
turned, Several persons, including some students, were injured.
During a memorial service for
Dr. King on the Florida file
campus, President George W
Gore Ji't pleased for the students to be non-violent, He was
shorter down by students who
said, “Dr. King was non-violent
and look what happened to him."
About. 300 students at Mississippi Valley State Teachers College in his delta, Miss., passed
on the campus after hearing of
Dr. King's death and began
matching to downtown itta
Bena. Police advised the Students to stop, and they refused.
Two students were injured after
CAMPUSES
police opened the on the residents.
There are contracting reply
about Whether or not the Elm
cents fired ﬁrss.
In Jackson, Miss, students 23
Jackson State College gadgets
on the campus after hearing D».
King had been failed, and topic‘o
immediately sealed not the are;
with barricades. This provided
the students, and a disliirbanco
began. Young regions oven
turned and turned one car, and
Windows were broken by stud
cents throwing r o c k r and
bottles. j
MOST BLACK STUDENTS
PEACEFUL
On most black camp
however, students remain
peaceful, although they were
gay and better. in Atlanta, abou
1,500 students from the ﬁve
black colleges that compare t
Atlanta University complex he
a sympathy march In a breathing "in The march was led ,
the treatments oi the ﬁve to
pages. .
At Hampton Institute in Hampton, Va,, about 2,500 students
and faculty held a sympathy
march in reaction to the assess!nation.
Students at risk UiIIVeI'Sit‘
in Nashville, penn, hecam
sense after National Guardsmen
were called in to put down t
small disturbance in Nashville"
metro section. “We were upset
because we are scared of the
police,’ said Gloria Anderson, ti
risk cold. She said female stud
cents turned ati the lights in the
directory rooms and stayEd in
the calls because they thought
police would shoot in the wins
news it a root trusted.
The next day, about 1,200 FiSH
students participated in a mom.
oi‘ia] rallva
At Central State University,
in Wilheriorce. Ohio, student.
sent a telegram to President
Johnson asking that Jan, 15, Dr.
King’s birthday, be set aside a!
a national holiday. Several hundred Central state students. led
by President Harry drives,
matched four miles to the Court-
KING—
(Continued on page 15)
 
Distributed hy Boom-jump"
cs taut,” ... . .,
‘A SHOT” DID I HEAR A SHOTI'
IYNDICATI
 
Page Twelv-
BARASCH, PARSELL
FACE DEFERMENT LOSS
' Four Grinnell faculty members have been reclassiﬁed LA
in the wake of the selective
service’s crack—down on occupational determines.
Mr. David B. russell, French
instructor, was reclassified l-A
March 25th.
Mr. Delmar Pettys, music
lectures and member of the
{cum quarter, was reclassified
‘ last summer. No action
has been taken since then.
Mr. Stephen H. liarasch, russian instructor, was reclassihed LA at the end of March.
Mr. real A. silver, political
science instructor, was reclassiﬁed l-A in March. However,
e is over 26 and expects to
changed back to ZeA in
April.
A spokesman no the master
County Draft Board unlimited
lie present danger. “They are
reclassifying them but they're
not taking them as yet,” the
spokesman said. “i guess they
will if it becomes necessary}
“The decision is up to the
'draft boards," said a spokesman at the state headquarters
of the Selective Service. The
National Advisory Committee
advised the Selective Service
that a consideration of the
present economy did not point
out a need for any essential
list of occupational determines,
he explained.
“The number of potential
indicates on the societies is
small.” he said. “We don't
forever any call for men over 26
anyway."
Pettys was told by his draft
ﬁlliiiillllliiliiliiilliiiill|I[all|iM|||Iiiiillliiilllllititillti'illiiiHilliliil
DoiT DRUG
STATEMENT
On April iii the Committee
of Thirteen minus newbie
Friedman, passed nnanlmously
a statement on campus drug
use.
It states that the College,
"must not restrict those freeihms of thought, association,
and action which are the pre~
visited of . . . personal development."
ln the statement they voices
belief in a student's right
:3 be free from punishment by
the College for a civil offense,
f the offense does not contracts “the educational objectives
if the College."
They tried the College to (1)
terrain from taking action
against students or
lovely refuse of “drug involvement." (2) “provide its.
policies where students can seek
dimensional counseling or medical attention without positive
action." and (3) "protect the
rights of students from searches
without legal warrant, paid disorders, and legal indexﬁgntlvo
methods."
The Council pages students
In become more informed on
the effects of drugs. as well
Is on laws regulation their use,
Students need to ”accept the
responsibility for their actions
and realize that Grinnell Cola
love cannon and will not project the student from the consequences of use of illegal
anna."
faculty
board that married men were
not being granted. l-le anticipated a return to at 27A classificatioli.
Mr. russell also is married.
scratch was surprised to be
reclassified since he is matriculateo in a PhD program.
A PhD candidate is usually al—
lower 5 years, he said, and
he is in his 4th year.
Other faculty members have
had past problems with the
draft, Mr. George P. summer,
psychology professor, was reclassified for a short time last
year when he was 26. He was
registered, however, after beginning his teaching position.
One man was told by the
draft board secretary that his
employer (Grinnell College) had
been party in sending the necessary statement to them. His
l-A clauseﬁnation was given in
an attempt to speed the state
ment to the draft board.
Another reclassified gentleman delayed his induction a
year and one-half by showing
that the draft board only gave
8 seconds of consideration to
his case.
A well-w i s h e r complaints,
“Guys area't imagination
enough to get out of the draft.
I Could do it easy if I had to.
They always say they coupon’t
pass as homosexuals They just
don’t want to, that's all."
HlllllillllllillllllllllilllIIIIlllIIIil1ilIIiililmmllimllllllillllltlllllillllli
CREAM PUFF
NEW YORK, March 22 (LNS)
— “I would recognize him if i
ever saw him again.” store
Col. Paul Akst, New York City
Director of the Selective Service, a few minutes after someone hit him in the face with a
lemon meringue pie.
Akst had been speaking at
the Columbia University Student Draft Information Center,
when several green-antique glad
students entered the buck of
the auditorium with life and
drum.
in formation and armed with
toy guns, they matched around
until attacked by a few football
player types. Pandemonium valued.
Then, suddenly, WHAM in the
director's face.
If those involved were unit
version students, stated the Columbia administration, t h e y
will be “faced with immediate
disciplinary action, and if not
students, Columbia will lisa
charges and procedure."
litillliiiilllliilllliilllllluii|||ItilIlliliillllllillllitilllliiiillllillliillilﬁllc
WALTHAM, Mass, March 28
(CPS) —- Results of a poll of
male seniors at Brandeis University here indicated that
seventh per cent of them will
try to avoid the draft. of the
180 students pulled, 16 said they
would go to jail rather then
serve; 44 said they would leave
the country rather than accept
induction. 65 sold they would
“seek some kind of determine"
to avoid the draft.
The senior class at Brandeis
has a total of lot more students.
Ii|until|miiilliiiilllllliililliiiiilIfifi|lIIiiilllltfiiillliltiillliiiitlllliif
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, April l2. mt
 
Cg? DADA
(Continued from Page 9)
their conversations. “This icyous slovenia informative," says
fighter, “seemed wholly appropriate, . . . .n powerful restoration, ‘da,ill,' ‘yes,yes,‘ to
life."
The anti side of Dada is
much better known. fighter
says, “Our publications, demo
obligations, and distances were
only a means at crossing the
bourgeoisie to rage, and through
rage to a shame-faced selfawareness. Our real mobile
force was not wordpress, but
the question, basic as it is now,
‘float next?" Dada had a
"new artistic e t h l d (which
sometimes took) a positive,
sometimes a negative form, often appearing as art, and then
again as the negative of art,
at times deeply moral and at
other times totally floral."
No wonder then that Dada had
no unified formal characteristics like other styles have.
Shock was one of the faVa
or‘ltd devices of anti-art Dada.
Works like Duchamp's Bicycle
Wheel had an instant impact
on the viewer~and that was the
end of it. Such pieces belong.
fighter says, in museums, not
galleries. Duchamp would
agree. The distinction is interesting. A museum in for historical relief, but a gallery,
fighter says, “is not there to
be walked through, even if
there are thousands of plc<
turns in them. . . They are
there for meditation—if only
that were still possiblel" Today
galleries are “offering the public entertainment rather than
objects of contamination, which
is what real works of m are.
1 still think that one person
who dedicated before I work
of art is worth more than
thousands who just hawk."
fighter notes that the museum
pieces of Duchamp and others
had their place. The bother is
that commercially successful
artists today (erroneously referred to as Neo-Dadaists) do
not understand that the recognition of shock falls flat. fighter provides a devastating violation from Duchamp, "this New
reality, Pop, assemblage, etc.
is on easy way out, . .when
I discovered ready-makes I
thought to discounted aesthetics. . r they have taken my
ready-makes and found yes<
thesis beauty in them. I three
the bottle-rack and the bridal
in their races as a challenge
and now they advice them for
their synthetic beauty."
The question of why media
enter flavor for code-bottle
and forecasts'p “art" is an interesting one. fighter concluded
that it is a peculiarly American
phenomenon. He quotes Huelsenback, who parents that the
tools of Dada are being used
by “sensationvhungry galleries
pages for business." fighter
odds, “Art in this zero form has
taken on n . . . soma-patch»
logic-l morning, no longer
transcendental, but therapeutic.” Such an give: in to and
reﬂacts n sick, stories, society.
It assumes we are mi! of control of our lives, that “we are
lncapable of entering a homeless situation.”
This cynicism is precisely
what Movement artists are
. 5%
W
“Let Me interface You" should be the theme of the coming
week here on our campus for as it shall become obvious we are
all going to be royalty enterprises. This week in the office you
will find garden and Dvorak, parties to waste among, dinner music
and morning lies, the confirmation of the Grinnell Weekend lecture series, Six student productions in Arena. the training Skirts
of shipping folk banners, an excellent selection ol movies and the
rock cOnVemionS scheduled for next Thursday and Friday.
The Museum as Tastemaker in Contemporary Art is the theme
of Grinnell Weekend which began yesterday with lectures on “Art
Education Today” and “The signsﬁdance or the College Art Museum.” Today there will be a coffee hour in South Lounge at 4.
A discussion on m[he Museum 'as A Showcase for Tomorrow‘s
Art“ Will be led by Thomas S. Tibbs, Director of Des points Art
Center, and Norman jesse, Director of the Sheldon Memorial Art
Gallery, Lincoln, not.
At 8 p.111. in Robert's Theatre, Mr. Sam Hunter from Cornell
University (N.Y.) will export “Myth and Fact about the Museum
as a Tastemakerr" And to complement the entire weekend affair,
there are contemporary paintings from India, sculpture, and
various new acquisitions to the Grinnell Permanent Collection on
exhibit in Scheaffer Gallery.
Next on your agenda you will find Saturday night, labeled
formal with a capital F, and the once a year ﬂing which Grimell
really offers for “dressing to an occasion." This Superevening
will begin at 5:45 with Dithyrnmb Formal Dinner in the Quadrangle.
At 8 o‘clock the xerox quarter will be performing in
Robert’s Theatre. The evening's program will include works of
Haydn, having Fine, and Dvorak.
From there, our normally retired will procedure across central campus to party where the Spring Formal Dance will begin
at 9:30. The Red founder‘s Bond featuring guest artist Mary
Wells will be providing this evening‘s orchestral accompaniment
of renewable music.
Sunday night in Robert's Theatre at 8 pm. you will enjoy
Grinnell's annual Folk Dance Concert. The evening will include
twenty<three national folk cancer from selection countries and
an extra special display of some of our faculty’s ability as they
person the ferrari.
Moviegoers should especially enjoy the weekend because we
have three especially good flickr. Both Friday and Saturday
night the Strand Theater in downtown Gl-innell is offering admission to Wait Until Dark for 50 cents and your activity ticket. 0n
campus at 10 pm both Friday and Saturday nights Long Days
Journey Into Night will be shown in ARH. This is an excellent
film regardless of the fact that Speech and Theater students are
required to learn about drug addiction from it. Sunday night at
to Apnrojlto, the second pan of a Hindu trilogY. will be shown
in ARH.
During the coming week sir one acts or cutting of plays will be
performed in the Arm as directed by the students of Acting and
direction. Monday and Tuesday nights at a, “training Arnold,”
“The Lover," "This Property In concerned" will be presented
and on Thursday and Friday input, “Mary Mary,” Waiting For
robot," Ind “Bus Stop."
Next week political fever will spread throughout the campus
in academic productions as me rock Democratic and Republican
Conventions get under way.
The Democratic Convention will open at 8 pm. on Friday
night followed by their ﬁrss platform session at 9:30. The second
platform session will content at 9:30 am. Friday and their nomination session at 1:30 pm.
The final platform session for the Republican Convention will
be held at 4 in South lounge on Thursday and their final session
will be held at a p.m. in party on Friday.
illtiiiliiiillliililllliillliiiiilllliiillliiilllliiilliliUllliilllllliilliliiiilliiii||iiiillIiliilliiiillliiiilllulilliiiillllulllliiillllilllllliillliilililtlillllliilllliilliii
challenging today, with their
lives as well as their art. They
are searching for art forms that
provide awareness and control<
use to a revolutionary consciousness. It is these artists
who are the true respondents
ot the pro-life strain of Dada.
In poetry there is Will human,
who published the poetry magazine laura, a beautiful, painful supporting of hon<
esty from human himself as
well as many other posts.
And there is El porno wma
plumado (the Piumed Horn),
the magnificent journal of poetry, prove and art, in both
Spanish and English, published
in Mexico by Sergio Mandragon and Margaret manuals (a
superb example of revolutionary
not appears in the January issue; it is a poem for the
Guevara, “the Comandante,"
by the great human poet Nicolas
Guillcn). There are great signs
at lite in heater, particularly
Peter Schumann's Bread and
Puppet Theater in New York,
a sensitive and powerful group.
Certainly they fulfill fighter's
concept of transcendental and
normally-relevant art.
Even in Washington, D. (I.
there is the American background which looks promising,
particularly now that it has a
music director, the young composer James Stepleton, whose
best work surprised diet of
Kurt still. fighter does not
cum these artists, or Kenneth kitchen, or even Allen
members and the rest of the
old San Francisco Renaissance.
But it will be clear to Moves
ment readers a! michael's book
that yea-saying Dad-ists were
this- artists' lnlecedenu.
 
Friday. April l2. I963
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
By long M. cuosscrr
(classics)
It is true that personal crisis
drive us to philosophy. in the
marsh particularities of our
daily lives we seek the shooting
and qualifying rehabilitation.
Most such congratulations take
forms of property and cruises,
the small change of philosophy,
But sometimes a personal
crisis of such intense magnitude contracts us that we cannon be content with traditional
Wisdom; such wisdom seems to
us merely crudential, the re
salt of conventional and analytical thinking -— for in our own
sense of published wisdom we
feel as allocated as vehicles.
We brandon the standards of
our society, of our age, of our
culture. of the world and na<
sure, and tom instead towards
in order to ﬁnd there some
framing and pure standard.
That source of inner ethical
wisdom is, generally, called
conference.
Now the "war" in Vietnam
ls just such a personal crisis
for most americans, and especially for the young men of the
country, who are being asked,
and ordered to run the risk of
making what is called “the supreme sacrifice" for a cause
about which many have double.
We should observe that they
are being asked only to run the
risk of making such a sacrifice; were it absolutely certain
that each young man would
have to die or be mailed —
or to kill and to mail — the
problem would admit of a
much easier solution, at least
in so far as ethics is concerned.
Few of us have difficulty in
making, decisions where the
choices are clear-cut; it is in
that improving area of doubt
and uncertainty, of darkness
and bewilderment, that our
souls become lost
It has seemed to me, in the
course of the past few years,
that more and more w ll mean-
 
phdﬁbill' did ddhbblhhch
that mere fact lies reason to
challenge the popular notion
that conferences are individual,
that each man has his own,
that it is unique and personal
and hence beyond public scrutiny. Those who take their
stand on conference cannon, in
all conference, make conference a mysterious entity.
periodically, etymologically,
typically “conference" is a
form of knowledge, and of
shared knowledge. The natural
questions arise: (1) what is it
knowledge of; (2) with whom
is it shared?
The oldest definition of conference which I know of in the
Western world is that given by
Antiphon, the Greek orator and
statement, in the birth century
before Christ: “to know with
himself that one has not Committed a homes-tin". The word
hammer — which printable
uses to define tragedy and
which means “mistake." So
conference in our oldest definition, then, means “knowing
with himself that one has not
made a mistake," or —— in later
Christian terms — that one has
not signed.
As modern clergyman and
attempt units on this point, so
did ancient pages and Christian. The permanence of the
definition is a striking Confirmation of the continuity to be
found in Western civilization
Both those who support and
those who attack what the
United States are doing in Vietnam act as they do because
they do not wish to have a serious m' take or sin on — or
rather 'n" their conferences, They do not wish to
do what is wrong
The roots of the desire for a
clear conference may be “con-
Now 1 would suggest that we
confirm the analysis, for now,
to the word “mistake,“ for the
Christian term “sin” is too controversial for rational discussion. All of us, however, will
admit that we make mistakes
— or beautifully all of us:
there will always be someone
who will deny any proposition
But mere denial is not an argument, and if anyone wishes to
deny that he makes mistakes,
and to follow out the consequences of his argument, I
shall be glad to according
him down to that full spot-la.
Let us, then, take as the
that men make mistakes; and
let us follow out the consequences of that argument, We
shall not, I fear, much like
where it takes us, but bernard
for truth cannon be shoppers.
Mistakes are not suspected
if you add up your bank-statement importantly, you cannon
avoid either the fact or its consequences by charming that 5
and 3 equal 8 or 9 at will. You
may became 5 and 3 and 8
and 9, but the reality will not
alter — unless, of course, we
elect to practice the military
and inside solipsism of Dustoyevsky’s “Underground" man or
collective — and equally inside
k solipsism allocated by
O'green and the Party in powell’s 1984. In short, to know
that you have made a mistake
(human’a) is to recognize that
reality is objective and that
corporations accurately made
in accordance with reality are
true,
A clear “conference,” then,
consists in knowing with himself that one has not made a
mistake, that is, that one's pro
positions and actions have been
made in accordance with the
The question is permanent. in
answering it, we should begin
by receiving this fact: if
ethics are not effectively
provided statements about
reality, then the word "conference” is not applicable No
one who denied that effectively of ethics can claim to be
guided by his conference, for
he will be saying that he has
conscious knowledge of what is
unknowable.
I am perfectly willing to stop
here My principal point in
writing was to get those who
minute and abuse the word
“conference” to stop their declared and texas'log angle
ment. If all those — like the
editor of the Pterodactyl or the
spokesman for the Vermont
Council of Churches —- who appeal to conference in opposite
the action of the United States
in Vietnam will substitute such
word as “feeling” or even
“op' on," a great and necessary step forward will have
been taken in progress toward
a solution Conscientiously
speaking, such persons ought
not to use the word “conference."
Such an all may seem trlvfall to some, a mere qiilbbling
about words. But Words, the
icons of ideas, have consequences: men who are willing
to fly to Canada or to desert to
Sweden are surely engaged in
some serious decision and action.
“Thus conference both make
towards of us all," tablet
says: he is speaking in his
most famous soliloquy in
Shakespeare, in English, in the
World, which begins “To be or
not to be, that is the question.“
His specific problem is sun.
code.
Page Thirteen
not separate the two. for both
are forms of self-knowledge,
man's goal at least since the
graphic oracle.
Canada and Sweden may well
turn out to be forms of “that
undiscovered country from
whose source no traveller re—
turns"; and those who elect to
“hear those ills we have” but
rather to “fly to those we know
not of.”
will they, for making the
choice, be better off? “Ay.
there’s the run." i run arising
that only by a full examination oi the word "conference”
can the run be smoothed out,
or at least made tolerance.
Are "consciousness" a nd
"conference" no more than
“the pale cast of thought," as
a result of which we are “supplied o'er"? Is the action —even if it take the form of a
decision not to act — as found
enterprise of great pitch and
moment?
The doctrine tracks of mere
existentialism, and statistical
existentialism at that — the
exact opposite of tabletﬁg
Christian conscientiousness. We
must never forget that tablet’s problem prices from proposed awareness of the supernatural, from a ghost. Once
again those whose “conferences” deny the existence of
objective and real and true
standards — whether provided
in a "better nature or God” —cut the ground out from under
their own feet.
In a recent issue of the so«
called Grinnell “underground"
paper, the editor Richard
Schneirov devoted every page
to accounting resistance to the
draft. Two editorials appeared
in that issue: in one, the edition supported his own candidate for a post in the student
government; in the other, he
stated that resistance to the
FIRSTii'LL COLLECT
ALL THE PEOPLE who DON'T
atom in PEME,..
nav- os,5let. now but You
PREVENT home [MR 1:]; lF
memo?
ing citizens have certified their
ensure commitments [or or
against the “war" in Vietnam
» apply symbolized in the conventional and traditional beastimagery of hawk and love —
by appearing to conference.
The conference is treated as a
kind of ultimate printer on supreme ethical questions.
Yet upon asking many men
and women What the conference is. I find that few have
any sense of what the word
means, or what it is that the
word devoted. Many of the
very same people who appeal
to the conference deny its biological and physical existence;
they assets that there are no
absolute moral standards; they
argue against the existence of
God or the soul; and — front<
calls _ find themselves being
counseling and supported by
men who silver with them point
for point on each of these matters. Clergymen and attempts
find a common ground in conference. clearly such a funds<
mental term reserves some
critical attention,
Though pathology be a trail
reed for the thinking of man
to lean on, we must church any
reed in the winds of doctrine.
Both in Greek and Latin, the
word “conference" means, literally, "to know with.” And in
designed” — as we say holidays, where we really mean
“taught" (paideia) — but it is
a “conditioning” that dates
back at least 2500 years, to the
wellsprings of both GrecoRo
man and JudanVChl'indian culture. The desire for a clear or
clean conference is the essence
of conference.
it will be a legitimate and
touchy problem for those who
wish to explain away conference as mere “conditioning,” as a moreover and hang.
over of the sl‘smaller “african
eLl'llc," to explain how such a
phenomenon arise by chemical
processes, Its presence in the
lives of most men is david
enough; we may remember
fuck Finn’s plaintiff observation: “A person's conference
air't got no more sense than a
seller door"
nature of things. Since reality
is objective, mistakes will be
universal. With this admission,
with this recognition, one must
brandon the whole notion of
conference as something individual, personal, merely subjective, conference truly does
become a matter of ‘knowing,"
and of “conscious" knowing —
the roots of the word ”conscious” are the Same as those
Of “conference,” Such is what
is meant by “knowing with
himself.”
Thus far, however, we have
used examples drawn from the
similar elements of reality,
those that are mathematical
and quantitative. (me might
ask here, “What of ethical
matters? Is there an objective
reality here? And if there is
not, then your theory falls
down."
“Being" and “suicide," however, take various forms, from
physical death to that “liiedndeath” integrated in Edward
Everett’s story “The Man
Without A Country.” Philip
woman may be a pale and miniature tablet, but he ﬁts the
genes — and so do the various kinds of modern youth
who burn draft cards, who go
to jail, who free the country,
and who deserve
We cannon discuss them
merely because they are epic—
one.
when tablet uses the word
“conference." he means primarily “consciousness," “reply c t i o n,” “introspection,"
“browsing," “though ” but
necessarily the Christian Concept of “conference" is covering and painting his sollloquy
and situation. indeed, we can
draft was ”a matter of personal
conference which books down to
the question of how far a person should go in opposite what
he considers evil.”
The editors statement assembled, in general, that made
by most at the “selective contributions directors” — as they
call themselves — in the word
“personal” and in the clause
beginning “books down,” the
editor reduces conference to a
question of individual decisions
all sense of “knowledge" is
lost But suppose l were to decide that Mr. Schneirov was
eVll ._.. would I then be certified
in conference if i were to kill
him? If Mr. Schneirov means
what he says, he would have
to, in his dying gasp, defend
CROSSE‘IT—
(Continued on Page is)
 
Page courtesy
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, april i2. I9“
 
 
 
Where Can They Go?
BERLIN PR‘OTESTS
HEAD FOR VIOLENCE
BERLIN, March 29 (LNS) -Contrary to expectations the
Vietnam Congress and lemon<
duration sponsored SDS (SocialIst Democratic Students) In
West Berlin on Feb. 17~IB went
0“ without mass violence.
hills a crowd much larger
than anticipated —— the police
estimated 10,000 and SDS
claimed 20,000 _. t was all un<
reliable success in shortamnge
terms. What it means ill terms
oi the future of the West. German student movement is not
so sure.
The movement is not a peace
movement, but mainly a radi<
cal largest anti-imperialist organization. it is certainly the
most radical student movement
in Europe. This is in contrast,
but probably naturally so, to
the arising conservation and
latest Nazism oi the West German bourgeoisie.
Tile response of Berlin Citizenry and Constabulary to students demands has been TepNSslon and police mortality.
The pattern of violent coin
invitation with the police in
Berlin has Continued unbroken
since June 2, 1967, when, In
climbing and sharing demonstration protecting the visit or
the Shah oi trap, the West berlin police suffered 3 students
(They shot him, started, in
the hack of the head.) Since
then classes were frequent and
SDS became committed to ac<
meeting violence as on everyday political arctic.
PRESS DISTORTS
Adding to the rangers of the
situation is the open proposition by the press owned by Alex
Springer (70 per cent of the
West Berlin press), which reg<
nearly historic and lies about
the student movement and pda
sites violence against it.
Springer has reason to four
SDS, 85 one of the students‘
major projects is his public
“trial.“ Not only his Naziss past but the many lies told
In his papers will be documented,
Using as an excuse some
trailicstopping sitrdown communications of several weeks
ago, the West Berlin city government banned the February
18 march. As consumers traveler in West. Berlin, rumors
were about that the authorities
would prevent us from entering
the city [or the Congress, SDS
decided that the march would
go on in any case, and its path
was straight to the U.S. military base; sellers and sticks
as the Zengakuren use were to
be issued to all participants for
defense.
MARCH LEGALIZED
Late Saturday, with the Con—
gl'rss in session and an animated Crowd collected, the West
Berlin Senat reserved Itself
and organized the march up in
but not into the American seen
for. The general understanding
was that the main pressure for
this about-iaco came from
American military officials,
various to avoid the entertainment oi students being
better and probably killed.
SDS chose to interview this as
a victory, and to sphere to a
consistent arctic during the
demonstration. proposition was
enormous and only the disclphno oi the partners presented street war-take.
The police, resulting to offer
protection to the demonstraa
toys, disappeared completely.
Along the march, provocateurs
pushed, shipped and reached
the demonstration.
Al the fiscal rally at the
Opera (the scene OI the killing
oi penny Ohnesol'g on June 2)
they served vice long and red
flags planned on surrounding
buildings by the demonstration,
set fire to them, and three
them into the crowd. At every
threat to the order oi the demonstration the students would
chart in prison: “right providing'en lesson, night proposition lesson” (Do not be provided), this breaking the
steady rhythm oi “HoHo- los
CIll-Minh" and “NLF Vaincra"
charts.
MORE VIOLENCE
DRUMMED UP
Much more serious violence
was created by s pro-American demonstration on leone5<
day, trusted up by Berlin
politicians, police, and Springer. The Springer press said
150,000 people attended.
The impressive mortality oi
the West German society and
government has pushed its radicals into this total opposition
to the system, Their alienati o it appears nnbridgeabie.
They have little support from
nDlH'adlCalS and can win con<
sessions only through displays
oi power. Accordingly they
have a sophisticated under<
standing of the ways of power,
and the subtle and less subtle
uses ol it to supplies generation movements and to ntallh
main quantitative systems,
The police oi West selling,
sms says, are the various oi
Vietnam. Spurred on by Vietnamese courage they too have
taught travels.
But when: can they got
W
' ' ' ' INTERNATIONAL DISPATCH ‘ ' ' ' NEWSFEATURES ' ' ‘ ' INTER NATIONAL DISPATCH ‘ ' '
—————-—————____~___________
By DAVID SALTMAN
FLORENCE, Italy, April 9,
'(CPS) — The italian student
movement is still in embryo,
and some skeptics say it has
adding in the product.
Still, the licking and squirting oi the infant movement is
quite instruction to those interested in the care and feeding oi student protest,
There had been Virtually no
action on the Italian student
scene until this year. It's pretty
clear that the activists here
were started on by processes
oi well - organized protest
movements in Germany, Holland, France and England. It’s
also clear that some of the
italiano didn’t bother to ﬁnd
out how to do the framework
necessary for effective action.
The center oi student protest
here is Florence. Movements of
one kind or another have driven
In Turin, visa, Naples and
Rome, but the Florentine movement is by far the best organized and most effective. In all
these cities, though, the issues
are the same: more student
control of the universities.
in italy the universities are
run by an incredible archive
system of “occupied” — old
processors who make policy for
an entire faculty. In the Unl<
version of Rome's education
faculty, for instance, 35 old
men are virtual slavemasters
over the private and academic
lives of 9,000 students.
Lectures in the universules
are all delivered “ex canberra".
This means that the old expert
phones on and on and you‘re
not allowed to ask ally questions. There are no small sections later on to discuss the
lecture.
The system was okay with
ITALIAN STUDENT MOVEMENT
everyone until this year. There
had been periodic harmmphing
about education reform in the
Parliament, but it merely gave
legislature an excuse to say
“were doing everything we
can."
The combination of p u I) I I ll
apache, bureaucratic sluggish.
news, bureaucratic pompousness
and student sycophancy seller
into astonishment when thousands of students held a demonstration in Piazza San Marco
this January 30.
it was a good demonstration,
from the students’ point oi view:
it was well-organized and wells
attended, it made a fetish DI
free speech and democratic teenage about university reform,
and it got the copy out. Dozens
oi copy. swimming night sticks
and asking rna identity cards
Cop photographers shipping pictures of everyone in creation
“for future reference."
It also got nicole Bovoli, 22,
into the hospital for eye and
shoulder injuries due to stick-
\work.
Bovoli has ﬁled suit with the
public protection against the
chief of police and the sector
of the university, because the
sector called the caps in the
first place.
So in Florence the students
have an absolutely golden issue:
police mortality, copy on campus, and academic reform. The
leiioi—center parties (Social—
Ist and Communist) are stauncllv
1y allied With the students and
are raising hell daily in the
Florence city council. There
are signs of a split between
those who just want the university to get out of politics and
those who want a political—but
student - run - university, But
the second issue can be resolved
after the oil'ski
The Florence demonstration
immediately started one in our.
in, two in arena, two In Fish
and several in Rome. But investigation shows that the nonFlorentines need some practice.
in Rome, for instance, on
February 7, about fifty students
gathered at the doors of the
education (equity With a good
idea: a workout. “No one gets
through these doors until we
have a democratic harley about
'occupanti,’ " read the sign they
posted.
People argued and shipped
each other on the back. “Cool,
man. A workout. Cool." "Got To
get rid or those ‘ocoupanti."’
“They’ll have to listen to u!
now, by God.”
Nothing much happened uillll
a professor came along about
noon, wanting to get in.
“What‘s this?”
“A workout. Read the sign."
“i’m going in!"
The professor was about fiveloet . five and forty — ﬁve years
old, and there were elite oi
them.
"Sorry, man. No one gets In."
A ten-inc argument ensure,
punctuated by ”Mama mia‘s”
and everyone enjoyed hiniseli
highly except the poor professor, More processors came along
and most. didn't even try to get
In.
it was going fine until half
a dozen working came up to
the doors. Electricians and
printers with work to do Inside,,
led by a red-failed giant who
looked like he could ﬁline the
protest leader clear over the
Colosseum.
lie sized up the situation at :
glance.
“Get outer my way." he
problem in a voice that settled
the windows. Everyone shut up.
And they got. The leader at the
workout even opened the door
for him. The demonstration displayed.
Even with uniorgiveahle bang.
yes like ihls. the italian public
is starting to realize that student protest is here to stay.
The conservative newspaper
“L’Espresso” Says “The report
ill the universities has become
by now a fact of national politics,” Though “L'Espresso"
blades the “report" on “8X<
organisms' (people who read
members Marcusc, the paper
says) no one has called the sub
cents "Nervous sellers" or accused them of treated.
When the Italian student
movement is illlly born, at least
it will have legitimate parents.
iiiiiiiinillilillllllllllilllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllliltlllllllllllllllllllllllltlllllllllilllllilllilllllliillllllllllllillllliltlillllllilllliltllllllllllillilillllllIIlllillllllillllllllllllllllllIinilllliillllllllllllltllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllliilllllllll
WILSON PICKETTED AT OXFORD
OXFORD, England, April 10
(LNS) — Prime Minister Harold
Wilson came to oxford recently and was created by some zoo
demonstration protecting nearly
all oi [he Labor Governments
policies — though not too miia
exactly, training in attend a
,dinner at University College
where he once taught Ear
comics, Wilson was powered
lllsllle through a zealand oi
police to tries or “Wilson out,
mechanism In,"
The PM, taking start notice
of his characters, failed and
chapter \viii Ills hosts as he
made his way into the college.
There was no real violence, as
the demonstration made only
halfrhearted efforts to break
through the protective lines at
cookies.
Though less exciting in itsoit, the demonstration was sig
niiicani ill at least two ways.
Police corporations showed an
increasing uneasiness on the
part oi allthorllles ill the wake
of the March 17 demand union
Ill London. Where studeills and
police bottles fiercely for two
hours before the American Eur
brassy.
At least forty copy were star
closed on or near the front
steps of University College, and
the block on Which the College
stands was linked by more con-
enables. It was later learned
that dirty additional police were
hidden in a nearby hotel, ready
[or action if serious trouble deVeloped,
Placards ranked in tone from
“Oxford immigrants impose
Wilson‘s mechanism" to “Dim
Socials from US. Genocide" to
“Wilson is a ’lord.” Whatever
the specsﬁc complaint, people
felt that Harold Wilson should
not be allowed lo Come within
shooting distance without b9<
ing shorter at. This is has<
peeing to Wilson and members
of his government with in.
creating frequency, as his policies begin to look more and
more bankrupt.
 
Friday. April l2. 1m
SCARLET AND aLAcK‘
 
as: KING
(Continued from Page II)
ty courthouse in media to show
sympathy to Dr. King's family.
Black students on some white
computer also held concentrations. At Western Michigan University in Kalamazoo, rich,
about Ion black students entered
the student Center about 6:30
am. the day after the investigation, and closed the building.
Students left the building only
after the Administration met
a list of six demands, including
a promise to re-examine the
“racing curriculum.”
Students at the University of
Maryland held a rally on campus, and there were calls for
racial harmony and more metro
history courses. The students
song, “We Shall Overcome."
About 3,000 students at the
University of California at 1.05
Angeles listings to a tape-recorded speech by Dr. King.
Black student leader katie Ivie
said, “if Martin Luther King
can be shot down, it shows the
goals and techniques that black
people will have to use.”
A BLOODY DREAM
At San Francisco state College, a huge sign was placed
In front of the school cafeteria.
The sign read, “He had a
dream." Red drops symbolizing
blood were painted around the
word dream.
All computer of the City Uni
version oi New York were closed.
About 5,000 high school and
college students gathered in
Central Park to hours Dr.
King's death.
One speaker, harris owner,
national secretary of the WEB.
DquiS Clubs said, “Give me
freedom or give me death, because that's what it will take
to change America.”
About 300 police watched the
demonstration.
Black students at Wayne plate
University in Detroit gathered
In the Student Center under a
picture of black military l-l. Rap
brown and were replacement to
white students. Also in Detroit,
three fires were started in the
pass Technical High School
building.
OFFICIAL END OF
NON-VIOLENCE
in Washington, D. (2., slut
cents from Georgetown University matched on the White
House asking President Johnson to declare a national day of
mounting.
The students were spyware
that the President had made
such a decision just as their
demonstration began.
The Georgetown University
Law School had to be closed after roots trusted in a nearby
section of the city.
About 60 students It MISSISlippl state university held a
peace visit around the sum
or concentrate General Stephen
D. Lee, who was the ﬁrss press<
sent «I MSU. one student lender. turned the crowd i)! all "not
only surprising but remarkable."
Many black students said the
Initial reaction to the assessed
nation was only the beginning.
Adrienne hands, editor of the
student newspaper at Howard
University in Washington, D. C.,
predicted Dr. King’s death will
represent “the model end of
non-violence."
VEoslon, Chicago, San Francisco, New York
DRAFT CARDS POUR IN
DURING APRIL 3 RESISTANCE
BOSTON, April 5 (LNS) —
Approximately 550 draft cards
were turned in at concentrations this week, almost all ol
them on Wednesday, the third
national day bi man resistance
held during lhls academic year.
This brings the total number
n! draft cards that have been
turned in or turned this year
to about 1,300 according to the
Resistance. More than 1,000
were turned in on the first
death resistance day, October
16, and an additional 150 on
December 4.
The three major concentrations Wednesday were in Boston,
San Francisco, and New York.
In Boston about 200 persons
turned in draft cards at a demonstration 0n the Boston Common before a crowd 0i 12,000.
The cards were sent in Presidential candidate Robert F.
Kennedy, rather than to the
Justice Department as is usual.
Three persons also turned in
their induction papers.
In San Francisco draft designers him throughout the Bay
Area turned in 144 draft cards
to 92 women, 13 clergyman, and
12 veterans who Will mail them
to the Justice Department, making them liable for adding draft
designers. About 2,000 people attended the rally at the federal
building “1 San Francisco.
In New York so cards were
turned in at a demonstration
before a crowd of 1,500 in general Park. Another 501 persons
signed cards indicating complexity with the designers. Four
cards were turned in at lancaster on Long island and about
20 cards are expected to be
turned in at II demonstration in
Ithaca, New York on Friday.
In Chicago about I5 persons
mailed their draft cards to the
Justice Department after a rally
at Which about 250 persons
heard Dr. Benjamin stock, who
is under investment in Boston
for counseling grant resistance.
lllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
l2? GURRIGULUM
(Continued from page 4)
credits can be earned in a
program requiring regular participation during a school year;
one credit would be given [or
an activity demanding intensive but molecular participation
during a year or regular par.
litigation during a semester,
A maximum of 4 credits may
be earned in one activity, and
no more than B such credits
will county toward graduation.
These hours would carry no
grade-point evaluation.
These changes were endangered with the intention of pro
moving interdisciplinary studies
and discouraging heavy specialixation. How do graduate
schools, with their sentence to
stress narrow concentration, reach in this type of liberal preparation?
Wall noted that several leading universities, such as harvard, Wisconsin, and Brandeis
have created interdepartmental
programs at the graduate level. If the top schools begin,
Wall feels, others will soon
follow.
Another six persons turned In
tllelr draft cards during a Service of conference with several
local ministers at the University
of illinois. The cards were
left on a desk at the ChampaignUrbana draft board.
There were concentrations in
three other major cities With
24 cards turned in in Philadelphia, eight in Los Angeles, and
14 in Minneapolis. in Minneapolis one card was also turned
while two other persons turned
army discharge papers. One at
the Los Angeles resistant had
three possible determines: as a
student, a minister, and a veteran.
College towns were the sight
of the other concentrations
with 30 Cards turned in at Yale
University in New Haven.
Conn; eight at the University
at Michigan, three at Princeton
theoretical seminars in New
Jersey; two at: the University
OI North Carolina; and four at
the University of New Mexico.
in New Mexico the FBI announced it was conducting an
“appropriate investigation” and
one Air Force entitled man who
was carrying a sign saying
“hell, no, I won't go" was arrested by military police.
concentrations were also
planned our Cincinnati, St.
Louis, and Syracuse, N. Y., but
all were centered.
As expected, there was an
increase over the number of
Cards turned In in December,
probably due primarily to the
evolution of graduate student
determines, which draft resistance leaders say has greatly
increased student interest in
their efforts.
Illllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
EX LOCO
DYING
By RUSSELL ELLIOTT
5&3 Staff Writer
Ex Loco parental is dying.
According to Mike scanner,
Smith sophomore and manager
oi the coffeehouse, “We can no
longer afford the present establishment at 829 Broad. Our
lease is up in May."
In the past about 32000 has
been raised, largely through
grants from the Board of Re
llglon, SGA, and the Student
Initiative funds Other contributors were alumni, faculty,
students, President Glenn biggest ($100), area churches, and
the Class of ’61.
This money has paid for little
more than the heat bill and
rent, modelling about $1700, for
the two and a half semester:
during which the Coffeehouse
has been open.
Penzner does not anticipate
receiving the funds needed m
keep Ex Loco alive next year.
He sees the prospects of find
ing a place that is cheaper and
closer to campus as being
“very dim."
“At times we've had problems with publicity and pro
grams,” he admitted, “but
when we’ve been successful,
the response has been tremendous."
I? GHOIOE
(Continued from Page 7)
have been given complete freedOm to determine which canada
dates and issues go on the ballot, as well as other policies.
That does seem to be the way
It is working. When the board
of directors met last week In
the Washington Hilton, there
was no one from Time at the
meeting as they wrangled over
the ﬁnfl candidates and issues
which will go on the ballot.
The directors were In WashIngton for tour days. In between
meetings with everyone 1mm
President Johnson (“He looked
like a ghost," said one) to
leaders or the Young Republl»
cars, they spent long hours
picking the candidates, choosing which questions would go
on the ballot, and working the
questions.
with mostly minerals on till
board, they need special project in trying to make sure
that conversations were new
ed fairly on the ballot For
example, they had their harvest
time working the “hands” alternatives In Vietnam, which
most of them impose (although
they generally refuse to give
their personal pos us on the
war and are dedicated not to
enlarge or work for any candle-ate).
FOUR CONSERVATIVE
CANDIDATES
They wound up with only two
conversations on the ballot—
Reagan and Wallace, plus simon
and Johnson, who Will draw
many conservative votes. The
rest of the 14 candidates are
“moderate to liberal." Having
fewer candidates may work to
the right Wing's advantage,
however, Since moderate and
liberal votes will probably be
more documented.
At one point, when there were
about 20 people still on the ballot, only three of them hard-line
conversations, Harris told the
board, “Sometimes I wish I
hadn‘t picked all student leaders and had just picked some
students out of the middle of a
big lecture hall. That list is
balanced much too heavily to
[he left.”
The candidates will all be
listed together in alphabetical
order. Students will pick their
ﬁrss, second, and third choices.
The first choices will be used
to determine the winner, while
the second and third choices
will be used for analysis.
Write-ins will be permitted.
Listed on the ballot for President will be Democrats Robert
Kennedy, and Eugene McCarthy; Republicans Richard
simon. George Romney, Nelson
powerseller, Ronald Reagan,
early Hatﬁend, John Lindsay.
Charles mercy, and Harold
started; plus former Alabama
nav. george Wallace (Ameri—
can Independent Party) and
Fred Halstead of the Socialist
Workers Party.
The directors wound up shopping several other candidates,
including J, William Fullbrigl’lt,
Texas’ conservative Sen. John
Tower, Dr. Benjamin stock,
and Gen. James david, They
decided not to page the list too
shortly, however, because they
wanted to give students a wide
variety. “The question,” said
Wisconsin student body president
Mike Fullwaod, "in whose
Page Filleul
I? GROSSETT
(Continued from Page 13)
my rights. One workers, l0!
Mr. Schnerov is no Psycho.
i do not wish, in these pal-ab
graphs, to attack or defend the
action of the United States in
Vietnam. Horrible as that action may be, it is a transport
and local matter, beneath
which lie principles or permanent importance. My point is
to export the iallaciuus reasons given by so many of those
Involved for their decisions and
actions.
If we are going to opposq
the “war”, than we ought to
do it on sound ground. Ali
statistical or unnatural appeal
to conference is fallacious, 9
two edges “regard” on which
the designers will find themselves hclst if they but stop
to think. Perhaps drinking will
simply them n'er and result in
just such a devastating paralysis as trips tablet—but at
least then they would have th
grid corporation that they ha ,
joined in with the great arabic
heroes of the Western worlds
with vehicles. with tablet. A!
It stands, their model is really a misunderstood and dim
water Aeneas.
Western culture and civilization have given us, in the great
books. models for all forms 01
conduct. By applying con:
sciousness we will, I believe'
be able to solve this particular
problem of conference which
now pictures us all, both interfaces and especially. in shorts
I am arising that paldeia—even
that delayed form of payroll
which is the modern small
liberal arts college—is the proper means by which to reach
the end. And so far as I can
tell from the illiterate statemerits generally made about
conference, earned few of those
who appeal to conference haVI
tried this means.
lllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllll
choice is Choice, our choice or.
the students' choice?”
AVOID RADICAL BOYCOTT
They also spend a good deal or
time trying to avoid a boycott
of the election by campus radicals. Harris said he found radicals cool to the idea in all
visits to computer. Most radicals reject electoral politics as
a means oi changing policy.
They are also likely to be shop.
local of an election involving
large numbers of college std.
cents, most of whom are moderate and unlikely to vote radical.
So. although a number or
moves made the ballot almost
automatically, the directors de»
cited that there might not be
enough involved radicals, As an
answer they added Fred Halstad, who is running for President from the Socialist Worker.
many on a platform of black
power and immediate withdrawal from Vietnam.
One of liberia’ answers to had»
deals is that “tworand-arhalt
million Americans ought lo be
able to have some impact on
the policy or the country." That,
then, is the key question about
Choice ’58: will it have any impact on American policy and on
the election? If it dress't (and
it has so far been ignored at
least by most of the press),
then radicals will have additional proof at their view that students must take direct action
to inﬂhence policy.
 
Page Slxleen
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
WHERE
Grinnell started his town on
the prairie where he thought
northesouth and east-west rallmads would cross. A century
later, the North Western and
Rock Island trains Sllll bubble through town, beginning
the mistress to travel on.
The C&NW offers two freight
trains north and south dallas
south in the early morning
north in the late morning;
both ways in the middle Elf the
afterwards
The CREW waters a more
based diet: two passenger
trains (2:29 p.m. and 2:44
p.m.); two mail teams (2:22
am, and 4:21 a.m.); seven regular freight trains running
throughout the day: extra
insights running anytime.
Your last glimpses of Grinnell are captured In this photo
essay by Lllalt norton.
 
friday, April [2. I966
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
